A clinical care pathway dedicated to suspected appendicitis can decrease times to both CT scan and surgical intervention.The NAR in general surgery units was over twice that in paediatric surgery units. Despite a more severe case mix, paediatric surgery units had a similar 30-day adverse event rate to general surgery units. Service provision differs between paediatric and general surgery units.Single-incision laparoscopic surgery appendectomy resulted in more pain and longer operative times without improving short-term recovery or complications. Long-term body image and cosmetic appearance were excellent in both groups.After appendicectomy for complicated appendicitis, 3days of antibiotic treatment is equally effective as 5days in reducing postoperative infections.Antibiotics for suspected acute appendicitis are safe and effective and may avoid unnecessary appendectomy, reducing operation rate, surgical risks, and overall costs. After 2 years of follow-up, recurrences of nonoperatively treated right lower quadrant abdominal pain are less than 14% and may be safely and effectively treated with further antibiotics.Hospitalization due to SBO, between open and laparoscopic procedures, in patients operated on because of suspected appendicitis demonstrated a significant difference, favoring the laparoscopic approach. The frequency of SBO after the index surgery was, though, low in both groups.Analysis of hepatorenal perfusion was conducted in 44 patients, suffering an acute appendicitis. In 22 of them laparoscopic appendectomy was conducted, in 22--appendectomy, using a standard access in accordance with Volkovich-Dyakonov or Mac-Burney method. There was established more favourable impact of laparoscopic appendectomy conduction on hepatorenal postoperative perfusion, what is connected with lesser pain syndrome severity, influencing common hemodynamics, and more rapid elimination (or prophylaxis) of postoperative paralytic ileus, as well as better physical state of the patients.Ultrasound sensitivity and the rate of visualization of the appendix on US varied across sites and appeared to improve with more frequent use. US had universally high sensitivity and specificity when the appendix was clearly identified. Other diagnostic modalities should be considered when the appendix is not definitively visualized by US.The supply of GSs does affect access to surgical services for appendicitis. Expanding on this finding, the recently instituted HPSA (health professional shortage area) surgical incentive payment from the Affordable Care Act should be evaluated closely for its effectiveness. Enhancing supply in critical shortage areas could reduce appendiceal rupture and improve surgical access more generally.The introduction of the ASM at GH has not significantly altered the rate of NA or PA. The NA rate at GH is comparable to other published UK and Australian series.The results of the study demonstrate that laparoscopic appendectomy can be achieved through a single umbilical incision and a single working channel using conventional instruments and that this approach is successful, safe, economic, and esthetic.The information provided by transvaginal ultrasound is likely to be of help when deciding whether or not to proceed with diagnostic laparoscopy in patients with symptoms and signs suggesting PID and, if laparoscopy is not performed, to select treatment and plan follow-up.Initial results show a shorter hospital stay and lower costs for the group of children with sequential postoperative antimicrobial therapy.The APPAC trial aims to provide level I evidence to support the hypothesis that approximately 75-85% of patients with uncomplicated AA can be treated with effective antibiotic therapy avoiding unnecessary appendectomies and the related operative morbidity, also resulting in major cost savings.The transumbilical single-port approach is seen as a feasible technique for performing appendectomy. It does not increase the rate of complications and represents a possible alternative to conventional laparoscopic appendectomy.Either SLA or SILA offer patients faster recovery period with acceptable complications than OA. Hence, laparoscopic approach might be considered as first option in the treatment of AA. However, all 3 techniques provide equivalent clinical outcomes despite the significant findings. Therefore, technique selection is based on surgeon's decision, experience, and availability of laparoscopic instruments.Greater inpatient delay before appendectomy is associated with increased perforation rates for children and adults within this population-based study. These findings align with previous studies and with the conventional progressive pathophysiologic appendicitis model. Randomized prospective studies are needed to determine which patients benefit from nonoperative versus surgically aggressive management strategies for acute appendicitis.SPLA failed to show any advantages over CLA relative to pain and cosmesis. However, SPLA is as safe as CLA (RCT number 01348464).The findings show the SILS approach to be feasible in the pediatric population despite the limited abdominal domain in younger children. Although SILS operating room times currently are longer than for LAP-A, they are comparable, and no other outcomes differed appreciably between the two techniques at the time of hospitalization or during the follow-up period.ClinicalTrials.gov: NCT01610193; Institution Ethical Board Approval ID: KEKZH- Nr. 2011-0501.GCC neoplasm of the appendix should be considered in the differential diagnosis in patients with primary appendiceal malignancy. Our cases demonstrated close correlation between our predefined CT pattern and the pathological classification.We have validated and refined a simple clinical prediction rule for pediatric appendicitis. For patients identified as being at low risk, clinicians should consider alternative strategies, such as observation or ultrasonographic examination, rather than proceeding to immediate computed tomographic imaging.The sensitivity of ultrasonography for appendicitis improves with a longer duration of abdominal pain, whereas CT demonstrated high sensitivity regardless of pain duration. Additionally, CT results (but not ultrasonographic results) were less likely to be equivocal with longer duration of abdominal pain.Warm, humidified CO(2) insufflation for acute laparoscopic appendicectomy has no short-term clinical benefits on postoperative outcomes in pediatric patients (ClinicalTrials.gov trial identifying code: NCT01027455).Physicians increasingly use computerized tomography (CT) for the evaluation of suspected acute appendicitis (AA) in children despite increasing awareness of the potential dangers of CT-associated radiation exposure. Many studies demonstrate the value of CT in the diagnosis of AA, but none have determined what factors influence the decision to perform a CT. We investigated factors associated with the use of CT during initial workup of children who subsequently underwent appendectomy. This is a retrospective review of all patients aged 0 to 17 years who underwent appendectomy for AA by pediatric surgeons over 11 years. Both univariate and multivariable logistic regression models were created to predict use of CT. A total of 546 children underwent appendectomy for AA, of which 293 (53%) underwent CT. In univariate analysis, seven variables were significantly associated with the use of CT: female gender, Hispanic ethnicity, initial presentation to referring hospitals, lower Alvarado scores, delays from onset of symptoms to hospital presentation, migration, and rebound tenderness. In multivariable analysis, four variables significantly independently predicted the use of CT: initial presentation to a referring hospital [odds ratio (OR) 3.50), female gender (OR 1.49), increased latency from symptom onset to presentation (OR 1.34), and the presence of rebound tenderness (OR 0.23), which had a protective effect; the overall model was statistically significant (P < 0.0001). This model is the first to define variables that significantly predict CT utilization in the pediatric population. Continued investigation will be necessary to develop effective algorithms for judicious use of CT for suspected AA.This study suggests that the use of a simple and reproducible score system may help in reducing ICU admissions after emergency surgery.Elevated intra-abdominal pressure during laparoscopy may promote systemic inflammatory response. In patients with generalized peritonitis from perforated appendicitis, we sought to compare acute phase response and immunologic status from laparoscopic and open approach. One hundred and forty-seven consecutive patients underwent appendectomy for perforated appendicitis (73 patients had laparoscopic appendectomy and 74 patients had open appendectomy. Bacteremia, endotoxemia, white blood cells, peripheral lymphocytes subpopulation, human leukocyte antigen-DR (HLA-DR), neutrophil-elastase, interleukin-1 and 6 (IL-1 and 6), and C-reactive protein were investigated. One hour after intervention, bacteremia was significantly higher in the open group compared with the laparoscopic group (P < 0.05). A significantly higher concentration of systemic endotoxin was detected intraoperatively in the open group of patients in comparison with the laparoscopic group (P < 0.05). Laparotomy caused a significant increase in neutrophil concentration, neutrophil-elastase, IL-1 and 6, and C-reactive protein and a decrease of HLA-DR. We recorded 6 cases (8.1%) of intra-abdominal abscess in the open group and one (1.3%) in the laparoscopic group (P < 0.05). Open appendectomy, in case of peritonitis, increased the incidence of bacteremia, endotoxemia, and systemic inflammation compared with laparoscopic appendectomy. Early enhanced postoperative systemic inflammation may cause lower transient immunologic defense after laparotomy (decrease of HLA-DR), leading to enhanced sepsis in these patients.Low-dose CT was noninferior to standard-dose CT with respect to negative appendectomy rates in young adults with suspected appendicitis. (Funded by GE Healthcare Medical Diagnostics and others; ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00913380.).Interrater reliability of patient history and physical examination variables was generally fair to moderate. Those variables with higher interrater reliability are more appropriate for inclusion in clinical prediction rules in children with possible appendicitis.The results of this study do not support a specific link between any one clinical symptom and NSAP diagnosis. However, patients with midline pain, without any increase in pain and without vomiting, and those with weak or moderate pain tended to be at risk for NSAP.Routine same-day discharge after pediatric LapAppy for acute appendicitis is safe, with good parent satisfaction.Urine LRG ELISA allows for discrimination between patients with and without acute appendicitis but exhibits limited accuracy because of immunoassay interference. Direct measurements of urine LRG with selected ion monitoring mass spectrometry demonstrate superior diagnostic performance. Development of a clinical-grade urine LRG assay is needed to advance the diagnostic accuracy of clinical evaluations of appendicitis.In patients presenting with acute right lower quadrant abdominal pain, we found the investigational enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) test for S100A8/A9 to perform with high sensitivity but very limited specificity. We found that shipping effect and delay in analysis resulted in a subsequent rise in test values, thereby increasing the sensitivity and decreasing the specificity of the test. Further investigation with hospital-based laboratory analyzers is the next critical step for determining the ultimate clinical utility of the ELISA test for S100A8/A9 in ED patients presenting with acute right lower quadrant abdominal pain.It is statistically concluded that oral contrast do not contribute to the a better accuracy. So in the routine practice, oral contrast has not to be recommended.Pure TVA is a safe and well-tolerated procedure with significantly less pain and faster recovery compared to traditional LA.We conclude that the all-in-one laparoscopic appendectomy technique is quick, scarless, and less costly than conventional multi-port techniques. Wider application of the all-in-one technique seems indicated.The use of one Hem-o-lok clip is as safe as an endoloop and/or stapler; however, the time of the laparoscopic procedure using the Hem-o-lok was shorter in comparison with the use of an endoloop, with the cost of the procedure being the lowest.The aims of this study were to compare outcomes of appendectomy between acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) and nonAIDS patients and laparoscopic appendectomy (LA) versus open appendectomy (OA) in AIDS patients. Using the Nationwide Inpatient Sample database, from 2006 to 2008, clinical data of patients with AIDS who underwent LA and OA were evaluated. A total of 800 patients with AIDS underwent appendectomy during these years. Patients with AIDS had a significantly higher postoperative complication rate (22.56% vs 10.36%), longer length of stay [(LOS) 4.9 vs 2.9 days], and higher mortality (0.61% vs 0.16%) compared with non-AIDS patients. In nonperforated cases in patients with AIDS, LA was associated with a significantly lower complication rate (11.25% vs 21.61%), lower mortality (0.0% vs 2.78%), and shorter mean LOS (3.22 days vs 4.82 days) compared with OA. In perforated cases in patients with AIDS, LA had a significantly lower complication rate (27.52% vs 57.50%), and shorter mean LOS (5.92 days vs 9.67 days) compared with OA. No mortality was reported in either group. In patients with AIDS, LA has a lower morbidity, lower mortality, and shorter LOS compared with OA. Laparoscopic appendectomy should be considered as a preferred operative option for acute appendicitis in patients with AIDS.The preliminary data show that the best cutoff score of Alvarado and PAS systems vary with the different time points of RLQ pain presentation. It may provide helpful information for primary or emergency physicians to determine whether the patient should undergo surgical consultation.Neither LA nor TVA affected female sexual function scores. This suggests that TVA does not have negative effects on female sexual function. The results of this study may prove beneficial in consultations with patients concerning the sexual sequelae of transvaginal surgery.LA can be performed safely with superior outcomes compared with OA in obese patients and should be considered the procedure of choice for perforated and nonperforated appendicitis in these patients.Ultrasonography is used liberally to aid in the decision making process of equivocal and complicated cases of acute appendicitis and it achieves good measures of accuracy. As a diagnostic tool it is unique in its ability to positively predict as well as exclude. A high negative predictive value suggests that more patients could be managed on an outpatient basis following a negative scan.Fast laboratory answers by POCT in an ED reduce the time to clinical decision significantly for bacterial infections. We suggest further studies which include a sufficient number of patients on deep venous thrombosis, acute appendicitis and acute coronary syndrome.The protocol for this study is registered with the current controlled trials registry; registry number: ISRCTN43896775.Families experience significant parenting distress related to the child's functioning and disruption in the child's quality of life that may be because of the delay in fully resolving the child's medical condition. In addition, parents experience negative consequences to their own stress as a result of the delay before the child's appendectomy.The morbidity rates, particularly for intra-abdominal abscesses and wound infection were less for laparoscopic appendectomy in complicated appendicitis than those reported in the literature for open appendectomy, whereas operating times and hospital stays were similar.French Ministry of Health, Programme Hospitalier de Recherche Clinique 2002.Morbid obesity is associated with a higher rate of complications for two commonly performed general surgical procedures and is associated with higher costs for cholecystectomy. Pay-for-performance metrics should account for the increased risk of complications and higher cost in this population.Early appendectomy for appendicitis in neutropenic patients appears to be tolerated well with a low risk of surgical complications.clinicaltrials.gov Identifier: NCT01002365.The measurement of urinary 5-HIAA levels is not an ideal diagnostic tool for ruling out or determination of acute appendicitis.Laparoscopic appendectomy is safe and effective. Wound infection and postoperative pain is significantly lower after this mode of surgeryThe sensitivity of abdominal US for diagnosing acute appendicitis was determined as 69%. The specificity was calculated as 60%, positive predictive value as 0.89, negative predictive value as 0.30, and accuracy as 0.67. Abdominal US is a helpful diagnostic tool for diagnosing acute appendicitis. However, it should not be seen as superior to anamnesis and physical examination findings.The study shows that use of MASS in patients suspected to have acute appendicitis provides a high degree of diagnostic accuracy and can be employed at Bugando Medical Centre to improve the diagnostic accuracy of acute appendicitis and subsequently reduces negative appendicectomy and complication rates. However, additional investigations may be required to confirm the diagnosis in case of atypical presentation.The incidence of gastrointestinal complications in renal transplant recipients is relatively high while about 10% is related to acute abdomen. Data concerning gastrointestinal (GI) complications were reported in literature mainly from referral center studies. A multicenter retrospectively survey was performed in Lazio, Italy, in order to evaluate the incidence of acute abdomen in renal transplant recipients observed to the emergency departments of not referral transplantation centers. Clinical and demographic findings regarding 14 patients who experienced acute abdomen between February 2005 and Dicember 2008 have been collected. The following data was investigated: etiology, diagnostic workup, duration of symptoms, elapsed time between admission and emergency operation if performed, morbility and mortality. The severity of disease at presentation was assessed by mean of the Acute Physiology and Chronic Health Evaluation score (APACHE II). Acute abdomen was due to pancreatitis in three patients (23.1%); to cholecystitis in three (23.1%); to acute diverticolitis with colon perforation in two patients (15.4%); to acute appendicitis in two (15.4%) and to intestinal obstruction in 2 patients (15.4%). Small bowel perforation was observed in two patients (15.4%) which one case, upon pathological examination, showed malignant lymphoma. The mean APACHE II score was 14.0  5.9. Ten patients (71.4%) were submitted to surgery. Overall mortality and morbidity were 35% and 42% respectively. Statistical analysis showed admission APACHE II score (p<0.01), duration of symptoms (p<0.05), and total time elapsed between the onset of symptoms and treatment (p<0.04) as factors significantly related to mortality.The results of this study suggest that as an adjunct to clinical examination, NLR appears to be of greater diagnostic accuracy than either WCC or CRP alone.Initial conservative treatment should be considered the best therapeutic choice for acute appendicitis with abscess or phlegmon.Our scoring system is useful as a first line, rapid, reliable and economic way of early preoperative diagnosis of acute appendicitis in children and in reducing the incidence of negative appendicectomy rate.NTR2148.The results of the study demonstrated that laparoscopic appendectomy can be achieved through a single umbilical incision using conventional instruments and that this approach is successful, safe, and aesthetic.This is one of the first prospective studies assessing diagnoses and workup of pregnant patients with right lower-quadrant pain. We recommend abdominal ultrasound be the first imaging modality for patients for whom surgical consultation is necessary, thereby determining if the pathology is obstetric. If inconclusive, a CT scan is necessary to guide treatment.Within ACS NSQIP hospitals, LA is associated with lower overall morbidity in selected patients. However, patients with complicated appendicitis may have a greater risk of organ space SSI after LA. Academic affiliation does not seem to influence the operative approach. However, LA is associated with similar durations of stay but slightly greater operative times than OA at academic versus community hospitals.Suprapubic SILS appendectomy offers better, cosmetically appealing results than the standard umbilical access. In case of retrocecal or purulent or gangrenous acute appendicitis, the view provided via the suprapubic approach makes access to and dissection of the appendix easy, and it also enables exteriorization of a drain without adding new lateral incisions.Time of surgery is shorter and the duration of hospitalization, amount of given analgesic is smaller, less number of postoperative complications, better cosmetic effect and advantages of application of hem-o-lok over endo-loop laparoscopic appendectomy is preferred.This prospective comparative study was conducted in the department of Pediatric Surgery, Dhaka Shishu (children) Hospital during the period of June 2007 to September 2008 with the children of <12 years, diagnosed as acute Appendicitis. Patient selection was done by simple random technique by means of lottery. For open Appendectomy (OA) conventional method & for Laparoscopic Appendectomy (LA) 3 trocher technique was applied. Data was analyzed with the help of SPSS version 10. In this study 60 cases with acute Appendicitis including both gender were studied by two groups, group-A include 30 cases for laparoscopic and group-B include 30 cases for open appendectomy. Postoperative pain was assessed in both groups by using FLACC scale and compared at 1st 6-hours, 24 hours, 72 hours, 96 hours & at day 7. At 1st 6-hours, most of the children 24(80%) of group A had moderate pain whereas 17(56.7%) children of group B had severe pain (p<0.001). At 24 hours most of the patient 17(56.7%) of group A had mild pain compared to 27 (90%) patients of group B had moderate pain (p<0.0001). At 48 hours in group A most of the children 23(76.7%) had mild pain compared to moderate pain in 18(60%) children of group B (p<0.0001). Subsequently at 72 hours and at 96 hours most of the patients of LA group were free of pain compared to OA group. At final follow-up on day 7, 29(96.7%) children of group A had no pain compared to 26(86.7%) of group B. Regarding analgesics requirement both qualitative & quantitative requirements of analgesics were less in LA group than OA group. About post operative wound infection in group A only 1(3.3%) case had developed post operative wound infection whereas in group B 7(23.3 %) cases had. The mean (+/-SD) of post operative length of hospital stay was 52.00+/-11.62 (range 48-96) hours for group A and 76.00+/-12.74 (range 48-96) hours for group B children (p<0.001). Laparoscopic Appendectomy is more effective, preferable & superior procedure than that of open Appendectomy to reduce the post operative morbidity in children undergone appendectomy for acute appendicitis.In the 2 institutions studied, the 5 pediatric surgeon's intraoperative classification of appendicitis correlated with the pathologist's reading in a high percentage of those patients labeled "acute" but in only approximately one half of those defined as "complicated." These phenomena are independent of the operative approach but may correlate with surgeon experience. Interventions to improve the timeliness of pathologic diagnosis may improve the accuracy and efficiency of care of pediatric appendicitis.NCT00908804 (http://www.clinicaltrials.gov).Appendicitis outcomes were similar in the beginning of the academic year in comparison with the remaining months. These findings suggest that patients with acute appendicitis can safely undergo emergency surgery early in the training year.A diagnostic pathway using routine US, limited CT, and clinical re-evaluation for patients with acute abdominal pain can provide excellent results for the diagnosis and treatment of appendicitis.Long-term outcome of carcinoid tumors is superior to non-carcinoid neoplasms. Among all appendiceal neoplasms, adenosquamous carcinoma is the rarest histological subtype which is most commonly associated with advanced tumor stage and worst prognosis. Appropriate oncologic resection is being performed in a significant percentage of cases in Germany. However, the high rate of right hemicolectomy in patients with small carcinoid tumors needs to be critically discussed.The postoperative length of hospital stay did not differ significantly between OA and LA for men. Laparoscopic appendectomy required more time and did not offer any advantages compared with OA.Chewing gum ameliorates recovery after open appendectomy by reducing postoperative ileus. It is a cheap and helpful treatment to be recommended in developing countries in Africa.The purpose of this study is to evaluate how body habitus affects reader confidence in diagnosing acute appendicitis and appendiceal visualization using 64 MDCT technology with and without oral contrast. We conducted a HIPAA compliant, IRB approved study of adult patients presenting to the Emergency Department with nontraumatic abdominal pain. Subjects were randomized to two groups: 64 MDCT scans performed with oral and intravenous contrast or scans performed solely with intravenous contrast. Three radiologists established their confidence about the presence of appendicitis as well as recording whether the appendix was visualized. Reader confidence in diagnosing acute appendicitis was compared between the two groups for the three readers. The impact of patient BMI and estimated intra-abdominal fat on reader confidence in diagnosing appendicitis was determined. Finally, a comparison of the effect of BMI and intra-abdominal fat on appendiceal visualization between the two groups was carried out. Three hundred three patients were enrolled in this study. There was a statistically significant difference in confidence based on BMI for reader 2, group 1 in diagnosing appendicitis. No further statistically significant differences in reader confidence for diagnosing appendicitis based on BMI or intra-abdominal fat were identified. There was no influence of BMI or intra-abdominal fat on appendiceal visualization. Increasing BMI was seen to improve reader confidence for one of three readers in patients that received both oral and intravenous contrast. No further effects of BMI or intra-abdominal fat on confidence in diagnosing or excluding appendicitis were seen. Neither BMI nor intra-abdominal fat were seen to influence appendiceal visualization.The use of the acute appendicitis score developed for paediatric patients seems to provide some benefits compared to an unaided clinical diagnosis and may, thus, be a useful diagnostic tool for general surgeons.Preoperative administration of rectal indomethacin in acute appendicitis reduces postoperative pain.Morphine relieved abdominal pain and improved the patients' cooperation for treatment and care. Furthermore, the morphine did not mask the physical signs of acute appendicitis.Most patients with appendicitis can be categorised within a few imaging profiles on US and CT. When two of the essential features are present the diagnosis of appendicitis can be made accurately.Laparoscopic appendectomy is a safe method, which also has advantages of diagnostic procedure for other pathologies, a better quality of life both in the early and late period, and a short hospital stay. The important advantage is also seen in the late period with better quality of life.Acute appendicitis has a complex aetiology with sex differences in heritability and environmental factors.Patients presenting with nontraumatic abdominal pain imaged using 64-MDCT with isotropic reformations had similar characteristics for the diagnosis of appendicitis when IV contrast material alone was used and when oral and IV contrast media were used.Diagnostic correctness is much more influenced by the reader than by the use of contrast medium (oral, IV, or both) or of simulated low-radiation-dose technique.A very important step in laparoscopic appendectomy is dissection of the appendiceal mesenteric pedicle. The aim of this study was to investigate the effect of LigaSure in laparoscopic appendectomy. Between August 2007 and June 2008, a total of 32 patients were included in the study. Patients were randomized into 2 groups. The first group's dissection of the mesoappendix was performed with LigaSure (5 to 10 mm), whereas the second group's with endodissector and endoclip. The surgical time, postoperative complications, additional analgesics use and hospital stay were compared. There were no significant differences in complication rates, use of analgesics and hospital stay between the groups. The operation time (49.06+/-14.73 min vs. 59.69+/-12.54 min, P=0.036) was significantly lower in the LigaSure group. This study demonstrates that dissection of the mesoappendix with LigaSure reduces the operation time and could be used safely. However, more experiences are needed to attain reliable scientific results.The discriminative power (AUC) of individual clinical features and laboratory test results for appendicitis was weak in patients with suspected appendicitis. Combinations of clinical features and laboratory tests with high diagnostic accuracy are relatively infrequent in patients with suspected appendicitis.PCT is potentially increased in rare cases of severe inflammation and, in particular, after appendiceal perforation or gangrenous appendicitis. However, its remarkably low sensitivity prohibits its routine use for the diagnosis of appendicitis.One trocar appendectomy is a combination of laparoscopic and open appendectomy. The advantage, along with improved cosmesis, is the possibility to introduce a dissection instrument through the optical trocar without an additional incision. In this prospective study the sense of one trocar appendectomy is evaluated in daily practise for a cohort of consecutive patients with suspected acute appendicitis. Twenty-two patients were enrolled. One-trocar appendectomy was successful in 13 patients. In 8 patients one extra 2, 5 or 10 millimetre trocar was necessary. In one patient a third trocar was necessary. Conversion to an open appendectomy through a grid iron incision was not necessary. The pathologist confirmed the diagnosis of acute appendicitis in all patients. The average operation time was 53 minutes. Complications included one wound abscess and one wound haematoma. In conclusion one trocar appendectomy is a good and safe technique in patients with the suspicion of acute appendicitis, provided that the operative team must be experienced in laparoscopic surgery and the constitution of the patient is suitable for this technique.Low-dose unenhanced CT is potentially useful in the diagnosis of appendicitis.Laparoscopic appendectomy is a useful tool in the treatment of acute appendicitis. Its advantages lie in its minimal invasiveness, its better cosmetic outcome, its lower rate of complications based on surgical expertise and state-of-the-art equipment. It can be recommended as an adoptable method for the routine patient with appendicitis.Both methods of administration of local anaesthetic produced consistently low pain scores in the first 24 h after appendicectomy. There may be additional benefit in a local nerve field blockade in combination with local anaesthetic skin infiltration.Because of a high false-negative rate, US as a sole imaging tool is of limited value both in women with unequivocal and equivocal signs of appendicitis. Observation is safe in women with equivocal signs of appendicitis.NCT00469430 (http://www.clinicaltrials.gov).Patients with hyperbilirubinemia and clinical symptoms of appendicitis should be identified as having a higher probability of appendiceal perforation than those with normal bilirubin levels.Our conclusion is that antibiotic treatment in the patients with acute appendicitis is quite effective, and these patients may not need surgery. The patients managed conservatively with antibiotics alone experience less pain and require less analgesia but have high recurrent rate.In this series, focused ultrasound after detecting maximal pin-point tenderness resulted in improved diagnosis of acute appendicitis in clinically suspected cases. Moreover, the percentage agreement between the operator groups increased from intermediate to good with improved accuracy. This shows that less experienced operators can improve their diagnostic accuracy of acute appendicitis using focal pin-point tenderness as the guide.Reassessment of CT images for acute appendicitis by body imaging radiologists results in a significant improvement of sensitivity, negative predictive value and accuracy. To prevent false-negative interpretation of CT images in acute appendicitis the expertise of the attending radiologist should be considered.The sensitivity of CT interpretations for the diagnosis of acute appendicitis differs considerably between radiologists. This interobserver variability has to be taken into account during implementation of routine CT scanning in patients with suspected acute appendicitis. Only in centres with expert CT radiologists is the implementation of routine CT scanning in patients with suspected acute appendicitis justified.The aim of this study was to summarize the extent of variation in imaging strategies in patients clinically suspected of having appendicitis. By means of a written survey, the policies for the imaging management of patients clinically suspected of having appendicitis in the Netherlands were inventoried. A questionnaire was sent to the departments of surgery and radiology of all 105 Dutch hospitals, including the 8 academic medical centres, in March 2006. Questionnaires were returned from 98 hospitals. It was found that, in the work-up of patients suspected of having appendicitis, ultrasound or CT was performed in a minority of hospitals for 50% or more of these patients. In the majority of hospitals, it was carried out for less than 50% of these patients. There is a widespread variability in pre-operative imaging regardless of hospital type. This survey shows that, despite the ubiquitous presence of ultrasound and CT in Dutch hospitals, the pre-operative imaging work-up in patients clinically suspected of having acute appendicitis does not reflect this, being performed in only a minority of patients suspected of having acute appendicitis. Radiologists and surgeons alike should be aware of the positive impact of adjunctive imaging in this group of patients - most importantly lowering the negative appendicectomy rate and also lowering total hospital costs.Defining perforation as a hole in the appendix or a fecalith in the abdomen is effective in identifying the patients at risk for postoperative abscess formation. Application of these criteria would allow substantial reduction in therapy for patients with purulent or gangrenous appendicitis who do not possess the same abscess risk. These data outline the first evidence-based definition of perforation.Postappendectomy wound infection is frequent in the pediatric age. It causes them important discomfort. We have conducted a prospective clinical study to evaluate this incidence under different surgical management. The subjects were children undergoing appendectomy for acute appendicitis. The patients belonging to the Control Group were operated, by standard surgical technique, along the first 9 months of the study period (n: 58). The Study Group was constituted by 101 children operated during the 9 consecutives months, identical on the basis of demographics and operations undergone, except for the use of, in an alleatory manner, sutures with antiseptic impregnation (Vicryl Plus, Ethicon Johnson & Johnson Medical), to close the incisi6n in children included in Study Sub-Group A, or gentamycin-containing collagen sponge (Collatamp EG, Aculia Fombona, S.A.; Schering-Plough, S.A.), placed within the muscles before wound closure, in the children belonging to the Study Sub-Group B. We have analyzed in the two Groups the incidence of postoperative wound infection and the mean Hospital stay. The use of sutures with antiseptic impregnation and/or gentamycin-containing collagen sponge, significantly reduced the wound infection rates in the children operated on for appendicectomy included in the Study Group, compared with the ones in the Control Group, therefore contributing to decrease the Hospital length of stay.The use of the appendicitis score can reduce the unnecessary appendicectomy rate in general surgeons treating children with suspected appendicitis.NCT00477061.The performance of abdominal MDCT in patients with a high degree of clinical suspicion for acute appendicitis reduces the number of false positives and has the potential to reduce negative appendectomies.Ultrasonography has a high degree of accuracy in the diagnosis of acute appendicitis. However, the diagnosis should be considered with the diameter of appendix over 6 mm. Therefore acute appendicitis with diameter of appendix having less than 6 mm should be evaluated with other diagnostic parameters.This study demonstrates the lack of impairment of cell-mediated immune function after surgery in children treated by laparotomy and by laparoscopy. The physiological integrity of children can probably explain this finding, since in the case of adults numerous papers have reported an immunological depression, more pronounced after laparotomy than after laparoscopy.This simple clinical score can correctly classify the majority of patients with suspected appendicitis, leaving the need for diagnostic imaging or diagnostic laparoscopy to the smaller group of patients with an indeterminate scoring result.Carcinoid tumours of the appendix most often present as acute appendicitis. It also emphasises the value of histopathological analysis of every removed appendix. The long-term prognosis of incidentally found carcinoids of the appendix is good.Elective appendectomy at the time of cesarean delivery does not increase inpatient morbidity. Consideration can be given safely to elective appendectomy at the time of cesarean delivery in selected cases, such as women with palpable fecaliths and/or an abnormal appearing appendix, a history of pelvic pain, endometriosis, or anticipated intraabdominal adhesions.Agreement on source control is lacking on more severely ill patients and those with complicated appendicitis. These data should be used to seek optimal management for these conditions and to minimize variability in future clinical trials of intra-abdominal infection.Perforation due to acute appendicitis was associated with current tobacco smoking. A BMI of 27.5 kg/m(2) or more and current smoking were associated with overall postoperative complications in patients with NPA.Urinary 5-HIAA level is not a good diagnostic tool for determining acute appendicitis.Atopy incidence in patients with acute appendicitis was significantly higher when compared with control group. However, eosinophilic infiltration rate, inflammation grade, and peripheral eosinophil count were not able to explain the relationship between the two conditions. Atopy is a risk factor for acute appendicitis.Laparoscopic appendectomy is good alternative for classic appendectomy, irrespective of the degree of inflammation. Accurate cleaning and rinsing of the abdominal cavity essentially decreases the quantity of complications even in cases with perforated appendicitis. This suggests the expansion of indications toward laparoscopic appendectomy in case of all children with acute appendicitis.ANNs can be an effective tool for accurately diagnosing appendicitis and may reduce unnecessary appendectomies.Emergency departments have different strategies concerning the use of computed tomography (CT) for diagnosing appendicitis. We explored the association between CT utilization rates and the negative appendectomy rates in patients with suspected appendicitis at three medical centers. A retrospective multi-center comparative study was conducted to determine the association between CT use and negative appendectomy rates at three different medical centers. Standardized extraction of data from medical records and operative reports was performed by trained investigators. Of the 339 patients included, 242 (71.4%) were imaged with abdominal CT before appendectomy (CT group), whereas the remaining patients were not (non-CT group). Thirty-six of the 339 patients (10.6%) were found to have negative appendectomies. The CT group had a significantly lower negative appendectomy rate than the non-CT group (6.6% vs. 20.6%, respectively, p < 0.05). The three centers had significantly different rates of CT utilization for diagnosing acute appendicitis (86.9%, 66.4%, and 13.3%, p < 0.05). These three centers also had significantly different negative appendectomy rates (2.5%, 16.8%, and 23.3%, p < 0.05). There was a significant inverse correlation (rho = -1, p < 0.05) between CT utilization rates and negative appendectomy rates. The rate of negative appendectomies in this retrospective study was inversely related to the rates of CT imaging before exploration in Emergency Department patients with suspected appendicitis.LA is associated with a shorter hospital stay from operation to discharge than OA, with no evidence of an increased rate of intra-abdominal infective complications.There is an apparent consensus on the many aspects of perioperative and postoperative care of pediatric appendicitis among Israeli Pediatric Surgeons (IPS). This study consolidates current opinions on appropriate management of pediatric appendicitis, providing a foundation for evidence-based outcome studies.We conclude that SAA can be done safely without the need for any special equipment, with definite advantages over conventional appendectomy.Laparoscopy is a reliable technique, safe and reproducible. It is an effective and relatively atraumatic tool to investigate abdominal cavity. This allows an accurate decision-making, which is especially advantageous in young women who have a high rate of non-appendicular pathologies. Laparoscopy also reduces the rate of unnecessary abdominal exploration while realizing a correct diagnosis of others possible pathologies. We therefore advocate laparoscopy in patients with abdominal right-lower-quadrant pain, especially women.Rectal contrast CT is as accurate, although less sensitive, compared with dual-contrast CT and significantly superior to noncontrast-enhanced CT for the diagnosis of acute appendicitis. Rectal contrast CT may be performed rapidly, saves resources, and may avoid the diagnostic delay and potential allergic reactions associated with oral and intravenous-enhanced studies, and, therefore, may be the preferred initial technique in the diagnostic workup of suspected acute appendicitis.Tigecycline was similar to imipenem-cilastatin in terms of both efficacy and health resource utilization. Risk factors identified in this study for both outcome measures are offered as support for guiding clinical practice.The aim of the study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of interleukin-6 (IL-6) and lipopolysaccharide-binding protein (LBP) in children with acute appendicitis (AA) and to compare this with the diagnostic accuracy of routinely used C-reactive protein (CRP) and white blood cell (WBC) count. Eighty-two consecutive children admitted to our Department because of suspected AA were enrolled in this prospective study and classified into two groups: group 1 (49 children who underwent surgery for AA) and group 2 (33 children with no surgery with diagnosis of non-specific abdominal pain or sonographic mesenteric lymphadenitis). There were no negative appendectomies during the time of the study. The patients were further classified into three subgroups: subgroup 1A (43 patients with advanced AA), subgroup 2A (11 patients with mesenteric lymphadenitis) and subgroup 2B (10 patients with non-specific abdominal pain). The perforation rate was 32.7 %. WBC count and serum CRP, IL-6 and LBP were measured on admission. Area under receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve (AUC), sensitivity, specificity and predictive values were evaluated. Serum IL-6 and LBP were significantly higher in group 1 than in group 2. The highest AUC for AA was that for IL-6 (0.776), followed by WBC count (0.684), CRP (0.637) and LBP (0.635). In conclusion, only IL-6, determined on admission, showed medium diagnostic accuracy, while other laboratory markers showed low diagnostic accuracy for AA in children. The new laboratory markers therefore do not significantly improve the diagnosis of AA.Laparoscopic appendectomy is at least as safe as the open procedure in the male population, although it does not appear to offer any obvious advantage over the open procedure. The diagnostic advantage that laparoscopy offers to fertile women makes the procedure attractive for this population.In this small sample of adult patients with RLQ abdominal pain and suspected acute appendicitis, CT imaging was performed less frequently in the selective group and there was a trend with mandatory CT imaging to reduced rates of negative appendectomy and perforated appendices.Compared with active clinical observation, early laparoscopy did not show a clear benefit in women with NSAP. A higher number of diagnosis and a shorter hospital stay in the LAP group did not led to a significant reduction in symptoms recurrences at 1 year.Percutaneous drainage with antibiotics is a safe and effective way of treating acute perforated appendicitis. The recurrence rate for these patients is relatively low, and very often interval appendectomy is not required. For patients with periappendiceal abscess > or = 3 cm in diameter, antibiotic therapy alone is insufficient and the recurrence rate is high.HI should be the preferred modality for scanning the right lower abdomen in suspected acute appendicitis. The diagnosis of acute appendicitis can then be more definitely ascertained.The association of piperacillin-tazobactam was more effective than that of metronidazole and gentamicin in the prevention and treatment of local infection in the treated groups. Therapeutic failure was mainly related to the presence of gram-negative bacteria.Acute non-perforated appendicitis can be treated successfully with antibiotics. However, there is a risk of recurrence in cases of acute appendicitis, and this risk should be compared with the risk of complications after appendectomy.An appendicitis score measured by health-related non-physician professionals has a similar diagnostic yield than clinical judgment.Two-trocar laparoscopic-assisted appendectomy represents a promising minimally invasive procedure for the treatment of acute appendicitis. It is fast and easy to perform, and it is expected to decrease the overall cost of laparoscopic appendectomy. Its only contraindication is excessive body weight; it remains to be evaluated in the setting of perforated appendicitis and retrocecally located appendices.This scoring system is easy, simple and cheap complementary aid for supporting the diagnosis of acute appendicitis especially for junior surgeons.Our data show that morphine effectively reduces the intensity of pain among children with acute abdominal pain and morphine does not seem to impede the diagnosis of appendicitis.Unlike other minimally invasive procedures, laparoscopic appendectomy did not offer a significant advantage over open appendectomy in all studied parameters except quality of life scores at 2 weeks. It also took longer to perform. The choice of the procedure should be based on surgeon or patient preference.We believe that LA is effective in any kind of clinical situation, with low traumatic impact and best comfort for the patient.Although early LA for an appendiceal mass is a technically demanding procedure, it can be performed safely in children with minimal morbidity and mortality. In an era where patients' demand for "key-hole" surgery is rising, early LA is a safe and viable option in the management of children with an appendiceal mass. It also offers the advantage of avoiding misdiagnoses and the need for a second hospitalization.The present study suggests that the presence of radiological images of fecal loading in the cecum may be a useful sign of acute appendicitis, and the absence of this sign probably excludes this disease. This is the first description of fecal loading as a radiological sign for acute appendicitis.In the samples tested, urine LTB4 levels were not instrumental in differentiating FMF from other acute right lower abdominal pain.Single dose of preoperative antibiotics is adequate for prevention of postoperative infective complications in patients with non-perforated appendicitis undergoing open appendicectomy. Prolonging the use of antibiotics can lead to unnecessary antibiotic related complications.The control group of patients was treated conventionally. Entero-sorption was performed through naso-intestinal tube with well-known carbonic sorbent UAO-A and pectin-containing medication made of red beet. The results were compared. A 1.3-fold decrease in entero-paresis naso-intestinal intubation duration, a relief in severity of the patients' condition by SAPS scale as early as on day 2, improvement of immunity indices, faster reduction of toxicity of blood plasma and leukocytic index of intoxication, a 12% decrease in postoperative pneumonia morbidity and postoperative lethality from 14 to 6.6% demonstrated advantages of entero-sorption with pectin-containing medication.Acute appendicitis may simulate many other acute abdominal illnesses and the exact diagnosis is important for the proper management. The present study was undertaken to evaluate the role of the Alvarado score in the diagnosis of a patient with suspected appendicitis. The study was carried out on 100 patients operated with a presumptive diagnosis of acute appendicitis on the basis of clinical grounds. Alvarado scoring was done in all these patients preoperatively by different personnel. Discriminant analysis of the Alvarado score of all the patients was done to determine the cut-off value in an Indian set-up. The positive and negative predictive values of the Alvarado score were 77.6% and 52.4%, respectively. It is more effective in men and children, with a predictive value of 84% and 92.8%, respectively. Discriminant analysis revealed a cut-off value of > or = 6 rather than the original value of > or = 7. The sensitivity of the Alvarado score increased from 69.2% to 92% with the new cut-off value of > or =6. The Alvarado scoring system can be used in surgical emergency departments to diagnose acute appendicitis. In women, additional investigations may be required to confirm the diagnosis. The original cut-off value given by Alvarado may be changed in the Indian set-up to increase sensitivity.Laparoscopic appendectomy has been shown to improve postoperative recovery when compared with open appendectomy. The present randomized trial was conducted to evaluate any further difference in outcome between needlescopic appendectomy (NA) and conventional laparoscopic appendectomy (CLA) in the management of acute appendicitis. Patients with the clinical diagnosis of acute appendicitis were randomized to either NA (instrument size < or = 3 mm) or CLA (instrument size > or = 5 mm). Standardized anesthetic technique and perioperative management were adopted. The primary end point was length of postoperative hospital stay. Other parameters such as conversion rate, postoperative pain score and analgesic requirement, return of bowel function, resumption of normal activities, complication rate, and length of the final scars were also assessed and compared. A total of 363 patients (NA: 174, CLA: 189) were recruited. Both approaches could accurately arrive at the diagnosis (NA: 98.3%; CLA: 100%). Compared with CLA, NA resulted in a significantly longer operation time (P = 0.015) and a higher conversion rate (P < 0.001). The final scars of the NA group were significantly shorter when compared with the CLA group (P < 0.001). Otherwise, there was no statistical difference between the 2 groups in terms of complication rate, postoperative pain score, length of postoperative stay, and other recovery parameters. NA resulted in a longer operation time and higher conversion rate. Except for a smaller scar, the present study was unable to demonstrate any other short-term benefits. Thus, the technique cannot be routinely recommended.Early administration of buccal oxycodone provides a significant pain relief to children with acute abdominal pain, without adversely altering the clinical signs or obscuring the surgical diagnosis.CT findings correlated with colonoscopic findings only in approximately half of the cases. Relying on non-prepared CT scan findings in planning patient management and colonoscopy may lead to unnecessary diagnostic work-ups.The Feny-Lindberg score is an inexpensive clinical tool that may improve the diagnostic accuracy for acute appendicitis in women of childbearing age, which is a group of patients where the diagnostic accuracy usually is low and where the arsenal of diagnostic tools such as computed tomography is limited because of radiation. The low specificity of the score in women of childbearing age must, however, be kept in mind.PCT has not a good predictive value in acute paediatric appendicitis but remains a good indicator of severity in paediatric appendicitis.It may be concluded that precontrast CT scan combined with serum CRP can provide a rapid and accurate diagnosis of acute appendicitis and other right lower quadrant inflammatory diseases.The didactic lecture format was not only enjoyed and valued more than the SPI, but our surgery students also perceived it as superior to the SPI in building confidence in history and physical examination skills. These findings suggest that surgical educators should develop ways to improve students' perceptions and attitudes surrounding the surgical SPI.Important factors for decision algorithm between a laparoscopic or an open appendectomy include severity of appendicitis, gender, day-time as well as the surgeon's individual laparoscopic experience. With appropriate indication for each technique, both procedures are of equal value in the treatment of acute appendicitis. Furthermore the positive patient selection for laparoscopic appendectomy contributed to a better postoperative outcome in this study.Despite widespread use of laparoscopic procedures, no adequate data are available to support specific recommendations for venous thromboprophylaxis in patients undergoing laparoscopic surgery. This prospective, randomized trial is the first to be designed to evaluate a regimen of out-of-hospital thromboprophylaxis after laparoscopic surgery. Consecutive patients admitted for laparoscopic surgery were considered for the study. The thromboprophylaxis regimen used for each patient was based on a risk score. Possible thromboprophylactic measures included elastic stockings and pre- and postoperative Dalteparin or early ambulation. At discharge, patients were randomly allocated either to continue Dalteparin for 1 week, or to receive no further prophylaxis. Patients judged to be at low risk were not randomized. Compression ultrasound of the leg veins was performed in all patients 4 weeks after hospital discharge. Fifty-three patients, all with acute appendicitis, were judged to be at low risk of deep vein thrombosis and were not included in the randomized study. The remaining 209 patients fell into two groups: 104 patients received postdischarge Dalteparin and 105 patients did not. The incidence of deep vein thrombosis was 0% (0 of 104) vs. 0.95% (one of 105), respectively (P = 1.00). The risk of postdischarge venous thromboembolism is low in patients undergoing laparoscopic surgery who receive in-hospital thromboprophylaxis. Given this low risk, a clinical trial powered to determine if extending prophylaxis in such patients reduces the risk of clinically apparent deep vein thrombosis would be unfeasibly large.The operative stress in open as compared with laparoscopic appendectomy is not reflected by circulating levels of IL-6.There was no difference in time to full recovery after LA and OA in patients with laparoscopically confirmed appendicitis. A trend towards better physical activity was noted after the laparoscopic procedure.Pain is the most undesirable and threatening experience for surgical patients. This study aims to determine the efficacy of pre-incisional analgesic bupivacaine infiltration (preemptive analgesia) on postoperative pain relief after appendectomy. A prospective randomized double-blinded study was conducted on 123 patients aged 13-45 years with a preoperative and-postoperative diagnosis of acute appendicitis admitted to Siriraj Hospital, Bangkok, from January to May 2002. They were randomly set into two groups: the control (61 patients) and the preemptive (62 patients). In the preemptive group, bupivacaine (Marcaine) was infiltrated into the skin and subcutaneous tissue along the proposed wound line before gridiron incision, and also into the muscle layer after incision. The control group received no injection. Routine appendectomy was done. Pain score was assessed by the patients in the first 48 hr while they were lying supine and as they moved to a sitting position at 24 and 48 hr after operation. Morphine injection was given on patients' request with pain score = 5 every 4 hr in the first 48 hr or until analgesic paracetamol could be taken orally. The pain score during the first 6, 12, 24, and 48 hr, including the score while sitting up, were all significantly lower ( p < 0.001) in the preemptive group. So were the total number of morphine injections and the amount of morphine used postoperatively. The pain reduction could be due to interruption of inflammatory or pain mediator cascades that normally occur during an operation. This study showed that pre-incisional bupivacaine infiltration is an effective and simple method of reducing postoperative pain for patients undergoing appendectomy.The conventional treatment of acute appendicitis is appendectomy followed by intravenous (IV) antibiotics until intraabdominal infection has resolved. It is controversial as to whether it is efficacious to add a course of oral antibiotics after cessation of IV antibiotics. All consenting patients who presented to Kern Medical Center between October 2000 and June 2003 with acute appendicitis were entered into the study. Perforated/gangrenous appendicitis was equally represented in the two study arms. After appendectomy, and when IV antibiotics were ready to be discontinued, patients were randomized to receive a 7-day outpatient course of either placebo (Group 1) or oral antibiotics (Group 2). Patients were monitored for infectious complications for a minimum of 3 months, and there was no statistical difference (11.5% in Group 1 vs 12.1% in Group 2, P = 0.61). The data suggest that adding a course of outpatient oral antibiotics, after completing a course of IV antibiotics, does not decrease postoperative infectious complications in appendicitis patients.The study vaccine was safe and induced only infrequently and mostly mild, local or general symptoms that all resolved spontaneously. It was well tolerated and accepted in adults.Sulesomab was well tolerated with no side effects and with no apparent immunogencity. Appendicitis was rapidly and accurately detected. In pediatric patients with suspected nonclassic appendicitis, management decisions incorporating sulesomab imaging provided benefit in separating surgical from nonsurgical patients.The objective of this study was to determine if judicious dosing of morphine sulfate can provide pain relief without changing important physical examination findings in patients with acute appendicitis. We conducted a prospective, randomized, double-blind crossover design. Patients scheduled for appendectomy were randomized to two groups. Group A received 0.075 mg/kg intravenous morphine sulfate and 30 minutes later received placebo. The sequence of medication was reversed in group B. Patients were examined by a surgical resident and an EM attending before and after receiving medication. Six explicit physical examination findings were documented as absent, indeterminate, or present. Physicians were also asked if they felt overall examination findings had changed after medication. Patient's visual analog scale (VAS) was recorded before each medication and at study completion. Thirty-four patients were enrolled and full data were available for 22 patients. Neither morphine nor placebo caused a significant change in individual examination findings. Three patients in both groups were judged to have a change in their examination after medication. The median change in VAS was 20 mm after morphine and 0 mm after placebo (P =.01). In this pilot study, patients with clinical signs of appendicitis were treated with morphine and had significant improvement of their pain without changes in their physical examination.The demographics, sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were comparable in both groups. The focused rectal-contrast procedure was better tolerated by patients and demonstrated decreased morbidity, delay to diagnosis, perforation rate, and negative appendectomy rate with no missed diagnosis and decreased cost. Therefore, we believe that focused helical CT scanning with rectal contrast only is a superior diagnostic modality compared with the traditional triple-contrast CT scan for the diagnosis of acute appendicitis.Urine 5-HIAA measurement has low sensitivity and specificity. The value of the test is even clearly lower in gangrenous appendicitis. This may be misleading in management of patients in late phase of appendicitis and in cases with perforation which is mainly responsible for morbidity.In acute appendicitis, a minimal inflamed appendix base can be safely divided using one endoloop.Laparoscopy may carry some diagnostic advantage over open surgery in premenopausal women with suspected acute appendicitis. Patients found not to have acute appendicitis have a marginally shorter period of hospitalisation after laparoscopic intervention. The outcome following laparoscopic appendicectomy for confirmed acute appendicitis is at least equivalent to that achieved with conventional appendicectomy. Laparoscopic exploration is an acceptable option in premonopausal women requiring surgery for suspected acute appendicitis.Pediatric patients with appendicitis can safely be offered laparoscopic appendectomy without incurring a greater risk for complications. Nevertheless, a higher (but not significantly higher) abscess rate was found in patients with perforated appendicitis who underwent laparoscopy.In this prospective randomized double-blinded trial, laparoscopic appendectomy appears to confer no significant advantage over open appendectomy for postoperative pain or lost work days. It does carry an increase in operating room costs and, contrary to other reports, hospital stay is not shortened. Further studies are needed to determine if specific populations, such as the obese or women, may benefit from a minimally invasive approach to appendicitis.Clinical assessment unaided by CT reliably identifies patients who need operation for acute appendicitis, and they undergo surgery sooner. Routine use of abdominal/pelvic CT is not warranted. Further research is needed to identify sub-groups of patients who may benefit from CT. Computed tomography should not be considered the standard of care for the diagnosis of appendicitis.The clinical and safety efficacy of a new wide spectrum beta-lactam agent for most pathogen intra-abdominal infection germs is evaluated herein. Its chemical name is Ertapenem (MK-0826). Its pharmacokinetic characteristics and the known antibacterial spectrum enable the potential use of one daily dose in the treatment of infections by aerobic and anaerobic bacteria. This is a sub-group of patients that have been treated within a multinational, prospective, randomized, controlled and double-blind study, to compare the safety and efficacy of ertapenem (100% vs 88%) with piperacillin/tazobactam in patients that have undergone surgery due to complicated intra-abdominal infection, from April 1998 to October 1999, pursuant to the IDSA/FDA standards. Twenty local patients were evaluated from a total of 623 patients in 17 countries. Acute perforated appendicitis was the most frequent pathology in both groups. The recovery ratio was slightly higher in the group, which was administered ertapenem, with no documented clinical failure. This study shows the efficacy of ertapenem in the treatment of intra-abdominal infections using a single 1-gr/day dose, equivalent to 3.375 gr of piperacillin/tazobactam every six hours. Tolerance and safety were similar in both groups. No side effects, or mortality cases were registered. The results of this study indicate that ertapenem might be the therapeutic option to discard the combination of antibiotics or the use of multiple doses in intra-abdominal infections.The clinical benefit of a diagnostic score for acute appendicitis was tested in a prospective interventional multicenter study on patients with abdominal pain. The study was performed in two consecutive phases: standard diagnostic work-up with no additional diagnostic support (870 patients) and additional diagnostic support with a score (614 patients). The two groups were comparable with respect to signs, symptoms and investigations related to acute appendicitis. Diagnostic performance of the final examiner decreased with the score: specificity from 86% to 78%, positive predictive value from 67% to 50% and accuracy from 88% to 81%. There were no differences in the perforated appendix, negative appendectomy and complication rate, however, the delayed appendectomy rate (2% versus 8%) and the delayed discharge rate (11% versus 22%) were significantly lower with diagnostic support by the score. In summary, the score cannot be recommended as a standard diagnostic tool for diagnostic decision making in acute appendicitis.The purpose of this study was to evaluate institutional differences in preoperative workup, operative approach, complications, and cost in patients with acute appendicitis. A retrospective chart review was performed of all adults operated on for acute appendicitis from June 1999 to November 2000 at the University of New Mexico Hospital (UNMH) and Stanford University Medical Center (SUMC). Variables compared included age, race, sex, duration of symptoms, type of symptoms, results of radiographic evaluation, time from emergency room to operating room, operative approach (open vs. laparoscopic), operative time, length of hospital stay, pathologic findings, and complications. Statistical analysis was performed by means of Fisher's exact test. A total of 154 appendectomies were performed for acute appendicitis at UNMH and 165 at SUMC. Statistically significant differences were found at UNMH vs. SUMC in time from emergency room to operating room (9.1 hours vs. 13.7 hours; P<0.001), operative approach (48% laparoscopic vs. 29% open; P<0.001), and negative appendectomy rate (13% vs. 4.8%; P<0.001). There were no differences in the perforation rate or other complications. Cost analysis showed that $56,744 more was spent at UNMH for the additional negative appendectomy operations, whereas $99,842 more was spent at SUMC for the additional CT scans. Institutional differences in the management of patients with acute appendicitis can result in significant differences in cost without clinically significant differences in outcome. The use of clinical examination and laparoscopy as diagnostic modalities instead of CT scanning resulted in a more cost-effective approach.Laparoscopic assessment of the appendix is reliable, and to leave a normal-looking appendix at laparoscopy does not appear to cause any long-term problems.On the basis of the conducted study, it may be assumed that laparoscopic appendectomy is a safe procedure, and that postoperative morbidity is comparable with that for a conventional operation. There was less postoperative pain and shorter recovery time after laparoscopic surgery than after the open procedure.Taking the appropriate clinical situation into account, urinary IL-8 measurement helps in the non-invasive assessment of active inflammation in at least a number of common acute and chronic conditions.Significant variability in practice patterns and resource utilization exists in the management of acute appendicitis in pediatric hospitals. Clinical outcomes could be improved by collaborative initiatives to adopt evidence-based best practices.Laparoscopic appendectomy in female patients with clinical diagnosis of appendicitis is the procedure of choice for the diagnosis and the management of acute appendicitis.Somatosensory hyperalgesia to experimental stimuli was observed in acute appendicitis. We believe that viscerosomatic convergence mechanisms and central nervous system hyperexcitability explain these findings.Even in patients with clinically high probability of acute appendicitis, diagnostic imaging should be performed because it accurately depicts a high percentage of normal appendices and differential diagnoses.Laparoscopic appendectomy is an alternative to open procedure in children with complicated appendicitis. Good surgical judgement is necessary in patients with an established appendiceal abscess.Laparoscopic appendectomy is a safe and accurate approach.The role of prophylactic antibiotics is well established for contaminated wounds, but the use of antiseptic wound wicks is controversial. The aim of this work was to study the potential use of wound wicks to reduce the rate of infection following appendectomy. This prospective randomized controlled clinical trial was conducted at a university hospital in the department of surgery. The subjects were patients undergoing appendectomy for definite acute appendicitis. They were randomized by computer to primary subcuticular wound closure or use of an antiseptic wound wick. For the latter, ribbon gauze soaked in povidone-iodine was placed between interrupted nylon skin sutures. Wicks were soaked daily and removed on the fourth postoperative day. All patients received antibiotic prophylaxis. They were reviewed while in hospital and 4 weeks following operation for evidence of wound infection. The main outcome measures were wound infection, wound discomfort, and cosmetic result. The overall wound infection rate was 8.6% (15/174). In patients with wound wicks it was 11.6% (10/86) compared to 5.6% (5/88) in those whose wounds were closed by subcuticular sutures (p = NS). We concluded that the use of wound wicks was not associated with decreased wound infection rates following appendectomy. Subcuticular closure is therefore appropriate in view of its greater convenience and safety.Neurogenic appendicopathy is a histopathological entity that can be identified by hematoxylin-eosin staining. History and clinical examination do not enable us preoperatively to differentiate between acute appendicitis, NA, and negative appendectomy.Ultrasonography is a more sensitive diagnosing modality than plain radiography for the diagnosis of pneumoperitoneum. The authors suggest that ultrasonography was a useful diagnostic modality when plain radiographs failed to reveal pneumoperitoneum among patients with suspected hollow-organ perforation.Neurogenic appendicopathy is a very rare histopathological entity in children. History and clinical examination do not make it possible for us to differentiate preoperatively between acute appendicitis and neurogenic appendicopathy.LeuTech is a convenient, safe, rapid, and sensitive imaging test for diagnosis of appendicitis and favorably impacts patient management in adult and pediatric patients with equivocal signs and symptoms.The benefits of laparoscopic appendectomy appear to be controversial. Since 1994, several abdominal procedures have been completed by using the needlescopic technique, but there appear to be no prospective studies to demonstrate the perceived benefits of needlescopic appendectomy. The authors compared open, laparoscopic, and needlescopic appendectomy in a randomized fashion with regard to duration of surgery, length of hospitalization, analgesic dosage, and surgery-associated complications. From March to July 1998, 75 patients admitted at the emergency station of the authors' hospital with a final diagnosis of acute appendicitis without tumor formation were randomized to receive one of the three treatment categories: open (OA), laparoscopic (LA), and needlescopic (nLA) appendectomy. Laparoscopic and needlescopic appendectomy were performed by using a three-port technique, although the size of the trocar used varied. There were 26 patients in the OA group, 23 in the LA group, and 26 in the nLA group. The mean operation durations for the OA, LA, and nLA groups were 55.4 +/- 28.0 minutes, 69.1 +/- 48.8 minutes, and 62.3 +/- 26.3 minutes, respectively, and these were not significantly different from one another. The mean number of the analgesic doses (Pethidine 1 mg/kg) required was 1.3 +/- 1.2 mg/kg, 0.5 +/- 0.8 mg/kg, and 0.2 +/- 0.6 mg/kg, respectively. Significant differences were noted when comparing the OA with the LA or nLA groups (OA vs. LA, P = 0.02; OA vs. nLA, P = 0.0002; LA vs. nLA, P = 0.06). The mean oral intake durations were 32.2 +/- 16.9 hours, 21.0 +/- 14.6 hours, and 20.8 +/- 16.4 hours, respectively, after surgery for the OA, LA, and nLA groups, and the between-group differences were statistically significant for the OA versus LA group ( P = 0.004) and for the OA versus nLA group ( P = 0.003). The mean durations of hospitalization for the OA, LA, and nLA groups were 3.6 +/-1.8 days, 2.8 +/- 1.4 days, and 2.4 +/- 0.9 days, and difference was detected between the OA and the nLA groups ( P = 0.02). The OA group rendered a greater wound-complication rate and ileus than did the other two groups, but the differences were not detected between the three categories ( P = 0.065, 0.6935). The result of the current study confirmed that the nLA procedure is a feasible and safe one. The nLA procedure provided substantial advantages over the OA procedure in the contexts of diminished postoperative pain and shorter hospital stay without significant increases in postoperative complication rate or surgical time.The efficacy of ultrasonography using the simple criteria was superior to that of the surgeon's initial clinical impression (P<.001). Our ultrasonographic criteria for the diagnosis of appendicitis are simple to use and efficient.43 children between the ages of 7 and 15 years with clinical symptoms of acute appendicitis were randomised to an open appendectomy (OA) or a laparoscopic appendectomy (LA). There were 15 acute cases of appendicitis and 5 perforated appendices in the OA group and 17 acute appendicitis, 3 cases of perforated appendices and 3 other diagnoses in the LA group. The operative time was a little shorter in the OA group. There were no differences in hospital stay or the postoperative course of the patients. In the LA group, there were two minor complications, no other complications were seen. When comparing the two surgical methods in the consistent group of patients with non-perforated acute appendicitis no statistical differences were seen in the operative time, hospital stay or in the recovery of the patients between the OA and the LA groups.We conclude that LA has no significant benefit over OA in routine use. In paediatric patients we recommend an open approach for clinically typical acute appendicitis, but there should be no hesitation to choose laparoscopic approach when the clinical diagnosis is unclear.Various imaging studies can be performed in the evaluation of patients with a clinical presentation equivocal for acute appendicitis. One of these studies is technetium-99m hexamethylpropylene amine oxime (HMPAO) labelled white blood cell (WBC) scintigraphy. The aim of this study was to evaluate the accuracy and clinical value of 99mTc-HMPAO WBC scintigraphy in the aforementioned group of patients. Forty-one patients who had acute right lower quadrant abdominal pain with a clinical presentation equivocal for acute appendicitis were included in the study. The anterior abdomen and pelvis were imaged up to 4 h after the injection of 125-300 MBq 99mTc-HMPAO WBCs and the results were immediately reported to the surgeon before a decision was taken on whether to perform laparotomy. Diagnostic accuracy was established by the intra-operative findings and the histopathology in operated patients. In non-operated patients, absence of abdominal symptoms 1 month after scintigraphy and/or identification of another cause of abdominal pain was used to rule out acute appendicitis. There were 16 patients with positive scintigraphy and 81% of these patients were positive within 2 h post injection. There were no false-positive or false-negative results. We operated on 17 (41.4%) patients, and only one patient (5.9%) underwent unnecessary laparotomy. We conclude that 99mTc-HMPAO WBC scintigraphy is a rapid, highly accurate method for the exclusion of acute appendicitis and that its use can lower the unnecessarily high laparotomy rate in patients with an equivocal clinical presentation.Laparoscopy reduces unnecessary appendectomies and improves diagnosis in fertile women.While laparoscopic appendectomy is associated with statistically significant but clinically questionable advantages over open appendectomy, a laparoscopic approach is relatively less expensive. The estimated difference in total costs of treatment (direct and indirect costs) was at least $2000 in more than 60% of the bootstrapped iterations. The economic significance and implications favoring a laparoscopic approach cannot be ignored.Patients and surgeons frequently opt for laparoscopic appendectomy for treatment of acute appendicitis. Clinical studies have shown this approach to be a reasonable alternative to open appendectomy. The objective of the current study was to assess the outcome of laparoscopic appendectomy using three different techniques. The study sample consisted of 150 children with acute appendicitis who underwent surgery at Al-Azhar University Hospitals, Cairo, Egypt, and at Al Mishary Hospital in Riyadh, Saudi Arabia, between October 1997 and October 1999. The patients were allocated to undergo extracorporeal laparoscopic appendectomy, Endoloop laparoscopic appendectomy, or EndoGIA (Ethicon Endo-surgery, Inc., Cincinnati, OH, USA) laparoscopic appendectomy. All patients were assessed for the severity of the disease at baseline using clinical and hematologic indicators. The ages of the children ranged from 7 to 14 years, with a mean of 10 years (SD, 2.14 years). Of the children, 55.3% were female. The results showed that children who underwent laparoscopic appendectomy using the EndoGIA had statistically significant shorter operating times, did not have complications, and had the shortest duration of hospital stay (although duration of hospital stay did not reach the statistically significant level of P > 0.05). Therefore, the study showed that laparoscopic appendectomy using the EndoGIA is the procedure that is most recommended, except for the relatively high cost of the disposable materials. Endoloop laparoscopic technique was the second most preferable procedure, and the least preferred procedure was extracorporeal laparoscopically assisted appendectomy. The major drawback of the last technique is the high frequency of complications. Endoloop laparoscopic appendectomy with a purse-string suture can be performed safely if the EndoGIA is not available.CT scan with rectal contrast is an effective method for diagnosing appendicitis and should be performed in all patients suspected of having appendicitis.Hospital stay was equally short, whereas laparoscopic appendicectomy was associated with fewer wound infections, faster recovery, earlier return to work and improved cosmesis.Giving an analgesic to patients with right lower quadrant (RLQ) pain causes greater alteration of abdominal signs predictive of appendicitis than placebo. A randomized double-blinded controlled trial of 68 patients who received either tramadol or placebo. Absence or presence of seven abdominal signs (tenderness on light and deep palpation, tenderness in the RLQ and elsewhere, rebound, cough, and percussion tenderness) and pain (100 mm Visual Analog Scale [VAS]) at 0 and 30 minutes were recorded. The predictive value of each physical finding (PF) was measured using an 11-point PF score weighted by likelihood ratios. There was significant reduction in mean VAS of 14.2 mm (95% CI 5.6 to 22.8) in analgesic group versus 6.5 mm (95% CI 1.6 to 11.4) in placebo group. The analgesic group had less normalization of signs as measured by the PF score in all patients [32 of 154 (20.8%) versus 40 of 121 (33.1 %) (P = .031)] and in those with proven appendicitis [4 of 33 (12.1%) versus 10/22 (45.5%) (P = .014)]. Parenteral use of tramadol in emergency department patients with RLQ pain resulted in significant levels of pain reduction without concurrent normalisation of abdominal examination findings indicative of acute appendicitis.Laparoscopic appendectomy is increasingly used in treating acute appendicitis. Several controlled series have demonstrated the clinical benefit of the procedure. However, some basal pathophysiologic changes caused by the laparoscopy still need clarification, i.e., whether laparoscopy can give rise to bacteremia. The purpose of this randomized controlled study in 30 patients undergoing surgery due to suspected acute appendicitis, either by an open classic technique or by a laparoscopic technique, was (by collecting samples for blood culturing pre-, peri-, and postoperatively) to evaluate whether laparoscopy during carbon dioxide pneumoperitoneum could induce bacteremia. Six patients of 12 in the group treated by laparoscopy presented positive blood cultures peri- and postoperatively. No positive blood cultures were demonstrated in the open operated group. The difference was significant (P = 0.0183). The clinical significance of these findings should be clarified in further clinical investigations.Graded compression ultrasonography is an accurate procedure that leads to the prompt diagnosis and early treatment of many cases of appendicitis, although it does not prevent adverse outcomes or reduce length of hospital stay.A subset of patients presenting with possible acute appendicitis has been identified that should benefit from imaging of the appendix prior to surgical consultation. For this group, CT scan appears superior to abdominal and pelvic US in terms of diagnostic accuracy and reliability. With this approach, a low incidence of negative laparotomies was achieved.Systematic abdominal ultrasonography in suspected acute appendicitis is recommended in adults.An algorithm combining the modified Alvarado score with selective laparoscopy is recommended for widespread use in the management of suspected acute appendicitis.A normal pre-operative serum CRP measurement in patients with suspected acute appendicitis is most likely associated with a normal appendix. Deferring surgery in this group of patients would probably reduce the rate of unnecessary appendicectomies.Although classic open surgery is simple, expeditious, and effective, it has some drawbacks, including wound sepsis, delayed recovery, operative difficulties, and possibility of unnecessary appendectomies for false appendicitis. The aim of this study was to assess the applicability and safety of laparoscopic appendectomy (LA) in a prospectively randomized trial. Seventy nonselective patients with suspected appendicitis were randomized to laparoscopic (n = 35, 17 male) or open appendectomy (n = 35, 15 male) and operated on an emergency basis. Operative findings, operating time, postoperative complications, and length of hospital stay were compared. We found that LA is associated with a shorter hospital stay, fewer postoperative complications, and better diagnostic accuracy, and it is recommended as the procedure of choice for the diagnosis and management of acute appendicitis.There are many questions regarding the advantages and disadvantages a videolaparoscopic approach in the treatment of acute appendicitis. The authors present the results of a non-randomized, prospective study with 496 patients admitted between January 1992 and March 1998 by the General Surgery Service of So Rafael Hospital Salvador-BA-Brazil. The patients were submitted for appendicectomy by video laparoscopy or by the traditional open method, and variables such as surgery duration, morbidity, mortality, costs, and length of stay (LOS) were compared. The results demonstrate that laparoscopic appendicectomy is a safe alternative for treatment of acute appendicitis; however, there are several disadvantages that gradually must be overcome.This study describes how assessment and documentation of children's acute postoperative pain is managed by nurses in university hospitals in Finland. A survey was conducted of 303 nurses working in children's wards of university-affiliated hospitals, and at the same time a retrospective chart review of 50 consecutive cases of operation of acute appendicitis was carried out. Charts were analyzed by content analysis, and the results of the survey are reported with percentage distribution and nonparametric statistical calculations. The results indicate that nurses assess pain mainly by observing the child's behavior and changes in physiology. Pain measurement instruments are rarely used, and nurses do not recognize them. The documentation of pain care is unsystematic and does not support the continuity of care. There is a clear need for development of assessment and documentation practices in the studied hospitals. Future research should look at the postoperative care of pain at home as well as care in non-university-affiliated hospitals.To evaluate syringe pressure irrigation of the surgical wound to decrease its infection after appendectomy, we designed a randomized control trial at the Emergency Department of Mexico City General Hospital, including 350 patients with acute abdomen suggestive of appendicitis, without any other infection clinically evident. The trial was randomized into 2 groups. Group I patients received prophylactic systemic antibiotics before surgery. Group II patients received the same prophylactic systemic antibiotics plus syringe pressure irrigation of the surgical wound with 300 ml of saline solution using a 20-ml syringe with 19-gauge intravenous (IV) catheter to measure the incidence of postoperative wound infection. In our results, 283 patients had appendicitis. Of these, 188 were uncomplicated (66.4%) and 95 (33.6%) were complicated. Of the complicated cases, 40 were assigned to group I, and of these, 29 (72. 5%) developed wound infection. In group II there were 55 patients and only 9 (16.3%) developed wound infection after syringe pressure irrigation [p = 0.000001; 95% confidence interval (CI) = 0.02-0.22]. We conclude that syringe pressure irrigation of the surgical wound after appendectomy contributes significantly to decrease the incidence of postoperative wound infection in complicated cases. It is a cheap, safe, and accessible method in any surgical room.Nonenhanced helical CT is a highly accurate technique for diagnosing or excluding acute appendicitis. Developing experience with the technique and understanding the subtleties of interpretation can further improve diagnostic accuracy.Factors indicative of or contributing to periods of decreased end-organ perfusion appear to be significantly related to abdominal complications. Also, medical history of peptic ulcer disease represented an individual determinant of severe surgical complications as ulcer perforation and massive bleeding.These data show that CTRC following a negative or indeterminate ultrasonography result is highly accurate in the diagnosis of appendicitis in children.Integration of a score into the diagnostic process may have unforeseen clinical effects. The tested score cannot be recommended as a standard tool for diagnostic decision making in acute appendicitis.It is presented the experience of 126 cases of acute appendicitis treated by a videolaparoscopic appendectomy using a 12 mm endostapler with 4 lines of staples and a linear cutting device in the middle. It has been used two trocars (5 mm) at the left side and one other (12 mm) trocar at the umbilicus. In the first cases other dispositions were used but this one seemed to be better. Through the left trocars, a dissection is promoted, isolating the appendix, its base and its mesentery, in which a small hole is made, close to the base. Through this hole, it is passed one of the sides of the 12 mm stapler. The device promotes the bilateral stapling and cuts the appendix at its base. The stapler is reloaded with vascular staples and then the mesentery is stapled and cut by the same way. It is a very fast method. Besides, the laparoscopic option gives the opportunity to equally treat appendicitis at unusual positions, to examine other pelvic organs (eventually treating diseases) and to aspirate secretions under direct view, anywhere in the cavity. The specimen is taken out of the cavity inside a plastic bag and we had no case of infection at the trocar sites. Only in 3 cases there were conversion to open surgery, due to difficult dissection and identification of structures, in all of them with very advanced disease and necrosis. It is concluded that this method is fast, safe, easy (although more expensive) and can be utilized routinely, at least in the first approach of the treatment of acute appendicitis.Laparoscopic appendicectomy has higher direct costs than open operation and is not as cost-effective when the longterm outcome is the same in both groups.Perforated and unperforated appendicitis behave clinically like two different diseases. They can in most cases reliably be distinguished using clinical criteria alone. Although greater diagnostic accuracy may result in a higher rate of perforation, close observation and timely intervention will only marginally affect the outcome.Both diagnostic scoring systems are better for excluding than correctly diagnosing AA; the decision to exclude could be made with a high degree of accuracy. Either scoring system may therefore be used in primary care of patients suspected of AA to help decide on referral to hospital.Unenhanced CT presents a similar overall accuracy to that reported by other authors who studied enhanced CT diagnosis of acute appendicitis.To demonstrate the efficacy of oral metronidazole (OM) in simple or complicated appendicitis with localized peritonitis, a randomized prospective study was carried out in 1083 patients, ranging in age from 4 to 50 years (mean age, 21.38). The patients were randomly divided into two groups. The study group (SG) (524 patients) received OM (500 mg for adults, 7-10 mg/kg if less than 15 years) 2-3 hours before operation. The drug was continued 4 to 5 hours after operation, every 8 hours, for three doses if the appendix was mild to severely inflamed. In the case of complicated appendicitis (114 patients), the same dose was given for 3 to 6 days, depending on the absence or presence of pus. Ceftizoxime was administered to the control group (CG) (559 patients) 2 to 3 hours before operation and then postoperatively every 6 hours for three doses if the appendix was mild to severely inflamed. The complicated cases in the CG (120 patients) received a combination of penicillin, chloramphenicol, and gentamicin for 3 to 6 days, depending on the absence or presence of pus. The serum concentration of metronidazole measured in 43 patients was at bactericidal level in 40 (mean +/- SD standard deviation, 10.65 +/- 4.89 microg/mL). The rate of wound infection was not significantly different in the SG and the CG with the same degree of pathology (3.17% vs 2.96% if uncomplicated; 15.78% vs 14.16% if complicated, respectively). Pelvic collection occurred in four adults and one child in the CG with perforated appendicitis (4.16%). The same complication developed in two adults and two children in the SG with perforated appendicitis (3.5%). All six adults and one of the children in the SG had to be re-explored, whereas the remaining two children responded to conservative management (OM and gentamicin). In uncomplicated cases, hospital stay and hospital charge were both almost the same in both groups. However, length of hospitalization was nearly 1 day shorter and hospital cost per day was about 30 per cent less in complicated cases in the SG as compared with the CG. Conclusively, OM may not only substitute parenteral antibiotics in acute appendicitis as a prophylactic agent, but it may also be used as a cost-effective drug and is more convenient to the patient.Morphine does not improve US-based diagnosis of appendicitis.Sulesomab is safe, well-tolerated, and with no apparent immunogenicity. Focal inflammation or infection in the setting of suspected atypical appendicitis is rapidly and accurately detected. Management decisions incorporating sulesomab imaging potentially provide clear patient benefits, especially by correctly predicting surgery to be unnecessary in 97% of patients without acute appendicitis.Helical CT is an excellent imaging option for differentiating appendicitis from most acute gynecologic conditions.Laparoscopic appendicectomy is as safe as open appendicectomy and has the advantage of allowing a quicker recovery.The results of rectal digital examinations performed on 477 patients upon admission with histopathologically proven acute appendicitis from a total of 2280 patients with acute abdominal pain were analyzed. Although 13.7% of the patients experienced pain on the right side and 7.4% pain in the pouch of Douglas during rectal examination, none of the rectal examination parameters was statistically significant for the diagnosis of acute appendicitis. There are well established and statistically significant clinical indications, such as guarding, rigidity, rebound tenderness or abdominal distention that actually make the unpleasant rectal-digital examination superfluous for patients with suspected appendicitis.In a prospective multicenter observational trial, the performance and clinical benefit of ultrasound of the appendix was evaluated in the clinical routine. Ultrasound of the appendix was performed in 870 of 2280 patients (38%); the overall sensitivity was 55% (range: 13 to 90%), specificity 95%, positive and negative predictive value 81 and 85%. There was no correlation between the frequency or accuracy of ultrasound and the accuracy of the clinician, the negative appendectomy or perforation rate.The clinical diagnosis sensitivity histological correlated was 83%. The mean operating time was 46 minutes (min. 10, max. 120 minutes). The basis of appendix was routinely carried by loop of catgut in 342 cases. In 23 cases was used the Endo-GIA. Severe postoperative complications were seen in 2%. In 1.3% planned second-look laparoscopy with drainage was performed. The patients stayed in hospital for 5 days in median (min. 1 day, max. 21 days). The rate of wound infections was decreased specially in fat patients.The diagnostic laparoscopy represents a special technique with high impact for differential diagnosis especially in patients with chronic recurrent pain in the right lower abdomen. The East-German multicentric trial confirmed the actual trend of increasing importance of the laparoscopic method especially in patients with unclear abdominal findings. In case of surgical treatment because of chronic appendicitis in 61.7% (n = 370) of all these cases an laparoscopic procedure was preferred. Unclear abdominal findings were treated in 73.7% (n = 205) laparoscopically. In case of acute appendicitis in 72.2% (n = 2934) the open procedure was preferred. The diagnostic laparoscopy can avoid the overlook of findings requiring therapy. The consequent laparoscopic approach allows to achieve a decreased rate of non necessary laparotomies as well as non detected findings requiring surgery. The rate of gynaecological findings was 16.2% (n = 184) of all women who underwent diagnostic laparoscopy versus 6.4% who underwent open appendectomy (n = 116).Based on the East German quality assessment study our investigation was aimed to evaluate if sonography has a diagnostic value for the indication to appendectomy or if it is only relevant for the differential diagnosis of acute abdominal pain. In a prospective trial we recorded and analysed all sonograms which were obtained in a period of one year at 34 East German hospitals. 3924 patients were examined by ultrasonography. The sex distributions was 1:1.8 on behalf of the female patients. The correlation of sonogram and intraoperative macroscopic findings showed a high rate (68.2%) of acute inflamed appendices in cases with negative ultrasound results. A positive sonogram with an inflamed appendix was confirmed in 90% of the cases intraoperatively. In our study the routine use of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of acute appendicitis shows a sensitivity of 21.5% an a specificity of 80.1%. The positive predictive value is 95.6% and the predictive value for negative results is 9.8%. In conclusion, if clinical examination shows the presumptive diagnosis of acute appendicitis, a negative sonogram should not withhold the surgeon to perform an operative intervention.A prospective multicenter observational trial was performed to assess the performance and clinical benefit of ultrasonography of the appendix in the routine clinical examination. Included in the study were 2280 patients with acute abdominal pain from 11 surgical departments in Germany and Austria. Ultrasonography of the appendix was performed in 870 (38%) of the patients (range 16-85%). The overall sensitivity of ultrasonography of the appendix was 55% (13-90%), the specificity 95% (range 82-100%), positive predictive value 81% (50-100%), and negative predictive value 85% (68-96%). With respect to single ultrasound scan findings, adequate sensitivity (44%) was achieved only with the target phenomen, not with the other criteria. There were no correlations between the ultrasound findings of the appendix and the diagnostic accuracy of the clinician, the negative appendectomy rate, or the perforated appendix rate. From the study it can be concluded that there is no proven clinical benefit of ultrasound scanning of the appendix in the routine clinical diagnosis.Laparoscopic appendectomy reduces LOS as compared with the traditional open technique in patients with acute suppurative appendicitis. The longer operative time for the laparoscopic approach in our study is likely related to the learning curve associated with the procedure and did not increase morbidity.Pharmacokinetic, bacteriological and clinical studies were performed in pediatrics on tazobactam/piperacillin (TAZ/PIPC), a combined drug of a new beta-lactamase inhibitor tazobactam and piperacillin at a ratio of 1:4. 1. Serum levels and urinary excretions of TAZ, PIPC and desethyl piperacillin (DEt-PIPC), a metabolite of PIPC, after one shot intravenous administration of 50 mg/kg of TAZ/PIPC to two children (6-7 years old) were investigated. The serum TAZ level at 0.08 hour was 50.8-51.0 micrograms/ml after administration. Then TAZ concentrations gradually decreased with half-lives of 0.38-0.45 hour, and reached 1.0-1.4 micrograms/ml after 2 hours and was not detected after 3 hours and 6 hours. Serum PIPC levels at 0.08 hour was 167.0-231.0 micrograms/ml after administration. Then PIPC concentrations gradually decreased with half-lives of 0.41-0.55 hour, and reached 1.2-2.4 micrograms/ml after 3 hours and was not detected after 6 hours. DEt-PIPC was detected slightly in serum. A ratio of TAZ to PIPC was about 1 to 4 in serum at each time. Urinary recovery rates of TAZ in the first 6 hours after administration of TAZ/PIPC were 33.5-90.1% and those of PIPC were 41.9-77.8% and those of DEt-PIPC were 1.5-2.8%. 2. TAZ/PIPC was administered to 27 pediatric patients (their ages ranged between 2 months and 11 years old) with various infections, and clinical and bacteriological effects and adverse reactions were investigated. Single doses were 26.2-55.6 mg/kg, frequencies of administration were 3-4 times a day, and durations of administration were 3 1/3-7 1/3 days, and total dosages were 4.5-33.75 g. Clinical effects were evaluable in 26 cases. Responses were rated as "good" in acute purulent tonsillitis 1 case and acute purulent otitis media 1 case, as "excellent" in acute sinusitis 1 case, as "excellent" in 2 and "good" in 1 out of 3 cases of acute bronchitis, as "excellent" in 13 and "good" 2 out of 15 cases of acute pneumonia, as "excellent" in acute urinary tract infection 2 cases and as "excellent" in acute enteritis in 1 case, acute appendicitis in 1 case and lymphadentis in 1 case. In all cases, the results were rated as "good" or "excellent". Antimicrobial effects against a total of 10 strains identified or assumed to be pathogenic bacteria were evaluated. The 10 strains of bacteria included 4 strains of Streptococcus pneumoniae, 3 strains of Haemophilus influenzae (2 strains beta-lactamase producing), 2 strains of beta-lactamase producing Moraxella catarrhalis, 1 strain of beta-lactamase producing Morganella morganii. All the bacteria listed here were judged to have been eradicated. Adverse reaction was observed in 1 case with mild diarrhea. As abnormal changes in laboratory data, leucocytopenia in 1 case, elevation of GOT. GPT in 2 cases and eosinophilia in 1 case were observed. On the basis of the findings, TAZ/PIPC was considered to be effective and safe in the treatment of pediatric infections.Neither determination of the plasma lactate concentration nor the results of the separate standard laboratory tests in acute abdomen patients resulted in a better sensitivity for the determination of an indication for acute surgery than clinical examination combined with standard laboratory tests and, if desired, supplementary radiology.A three year prospective randomised study was undertaken to study the efficacy of three regimens of antimicrobial drug combinations in reducing postoperative wound sepsis in acute appendicitis. Group A--Metronidazole and gentamicin; Group B--Metronidazole and ciprofloxacin; Group C--Metronidazole and cefotaxime. Randomization was done by drawing from a set of sealed envelopes. Antibiotics were started preoperatively once a presumptive diagnosis of appendicitis was made, provided there was no history of prior antibiotic usage. For simple appendicitis (normal or inflamed) two more doses were given postoperatively. For complicated appendicitis, duration of antibiotic treatment was four days postoperatively. All antibiotics were given intravenously to avoid variations in bioavailability. Wound was inspected daily till discharge and at 30 days post operatively or earlier if the patient had symptoms of wound infection. A total of 128 patients completed the study. Eighty nine were simple appendicitis while the rest were complicated. Twenty one developed wound infection. Out of 21, 13 occurred in group A, 5 in group B and 3 in group C. Individually, the difference in infection rates between group A and group C patients with simple appendicitis was statistically significant. Infection rates in all other groups were not statistically different. Cefotaxime and metronidazole combination had the lowest wound infection rate. Hence it is recommended for antibiotic prophylaxis.Traditional intraoperative abdominal cavity culture can be abandoned. In perforated appendicitis, colonic flora can be predicted, and antibiotic therapy should begun without any abdominal cavity culture results. This practical approach will save money and reduce laboratory work without affecting the patient's morbidity.Ultrasonography enabled us to diagnose acute appendicitis in more patients more often and more quickly than clinical evaluation alone, suggesting that US may produce a better outcome. The revised clinical algorithm may be helpful in the study of US in patients with suspected acute appendicitis in prospective randomised controlled clinical trials.Laparoscopic appendectomy is as safe and as effective as the open procedure; however, it does not decrease the rate of postoperative infectious complications.The use of an artificial neural network system was studied in the diagnosis of acute abdominal pain, especially acute appendicitis, with patients from Finland and Germany. Separate Learning Vector Quantization (LVQ) neural networks were trained with a training set from each database and also with a combined database. Each neural network was evaluated separately with a test set of cases from each database. With the combined database different neighborhood methods were compared to find the optimal choice for this decision-making problem. The acute appendicitis cases of the Finnish test data set were classified well with all the networks, but the cases of the German test set were difficult to classify for the Finnish network. The use of larger neighborhoods increased the sensitivity of the classification by nearly 10%. The differences in the results of the Finnish and German databases suggest that there are differences in the data collection or patient populations between centers. Therefore, care must be taken when using decision-support systems which have been developed in other centers. Neural networks offer a method to evaluate differences between databases. With the use of larger neighborhoods, the effects of the differences on the accuracy of the classification can be partly diminished.We conclude that ceftizoxime is as effective as cefoxitin and can be surely employed in the treatment of acute appendicitis in children. Its addition, its longer half-life simplifies its use in clinical practice.Over a period of 6 months, 48 children who underwent conventional appendectomy (CA) were compared to 34 children who had laparoscopic appendectomy (LA) for acute and recurrent subacute appendicitis. Their ages ranged from 4 to 12 years (mean 8). LA took significantly longer, 76 min, versus 50 min for CA. Less than 2 days' hospitalization was required in 95% of LA cases and 45% of CA cases. Time to return to normal activity averaged 7 days for LA and 12 days for CA (P < 0.001). Wound complications were fewer and the cosmetic appearance was most satisfactory in LA patients. LA is a safe operation that has the advantage of being exploratory, with shorter hospitalization time, early ambulation, and superior cosmetic results.AA is an unusual event in patients with SCD. The likelihood of developing appendicitis in SCD patients is less than one third of that for the population at large. Conservative therapy is warranted in the large majority of patients with SCD who present with acute abdominal pain. Surgical exploration is best limited to patients with clear evidence of potential surgical pathology or progressive findings during a period of observation. The biologic basis of our findings remains unknown.Tc-99m IgG scintigraphy can provide the clinicians a simple, rapid, and definitive test for the diagnosis of acute appendicitis.The findings suggest that laparoscopic appendectomy should be avoided in children who have complicated appendicitis because of the increased risk for postoperative intraabdominal abscesses. The authors propose a prospective, randomized trial to verify this finding.In the 119 cases in group A, the rate of incision infection was 0.8%. By contrast, the rate of infection among the 120 cases in group B was 11.6%. The statistical analysis (chi square) was significant, with P < 0.001 showing that preincisional or intraincisional infiltration with metronidazole was effective.All women of child-bearing age suspected of having acute appendicitis should undergo diagnostic laparoscopy prior to the planned appendicectomy, regardless of the certainty of the preoperative diagnosis. This is currently the only way to reduce the negative appendicectomy rate and establish a correct diagnosis allowing prompt and appropriate treatment. In male patients and postmenopausal women one may proceed directly to emergency appendicectomy.To study comparative results between laparoscopic and open appendectomy, all the patients with suspected acute appendicitis who presented between January 1992 and December 1994 (N = 210) were randomized into two groups: laparoscopic (LA, n = 106) and open appendectomy (OA, n = 104). Patient demographics, pathological findings, operative time, postoperative course, and cost were analyzed. Age, gender, previous laparotomy, intraoperative diagnosis, and perforated appendix rate were comparable between both groups. Mean operative time was longer in the LA group (p < 0.05). Earlier resumption of a regular diet, shorter postoperative stay, and less postoperative analgesia also were observed in the LA group (p < 0.05). Postoperative morbidity and hospital readmissions were similar in both groups (p > 0.05). Higher operative cost was observed in the LA group, but global cost was lower in this group (p < 0.05). Laparoscopic appendectomy shows a more comfortable postoperative course (oral resumption, postoperative stay, and analgesia) over open appendectomy, with similar postoperative morbidity. The LA group showed more operative but less global cost.Compared with healthy control subjects, preemptive analgesia did not reduce postoperative pain, reduce analgesic requirements, or shorten the length of hospital stay in patients who underwent an appendectomy. Premptive analgesia may be applicable only for patients without preoperative pain.Biochemical tests are of additional value in a computer model, and the tests should, if used rationally, also provide physicians with important information in the investigation of acute appendicitis.The high sensitivity and negative predictive value of Tc-WBC imaging may permit patients to be screened and discharged from the emergency department. Focally positive scans often indicate disease requiring operation but not in all cases. The Tc-WBC imaging reduced the negative laparotomy rate to 3.9% while reducing admission rates and hospital length of stay.Laparoscopic appendectomies and OAs are comparable for complications, postoperative pain control, length of hospitalization, and recovery time. Patients who underwent an OA had a shorter operative time and lower operating room and hospital charges. Laparoscopic appendectomy does not offer any proved benefits compared with the open approach for the routine patient with acute appendicitis.The management of appendicular mass seems to be taking turn with the availability of better antibiotics, care and anaesthesia. Quite a few workers turned to the other extreme of traditional conservative approach and reported acceptable results with immediate intervention during phlegmonous stage. But practically, surgeons still continue to adopt the same old regime. To alleviate this fear and circumvent the disadvantages of immediate intervention a midpath regime called early appendicectomy has been clinically evaluated. With this new approach in the present study preventing misdiagnosis (15%), no chance of recurrence as also of missing in the follow-up and shorter overall hospital stay with economy are some strong reasons to adopt this regime.The laparoscopic procedure is at least as good as conventional appendicectomy. Initial laparoscopy reduces the rate of misdiagnosis.It was shown in this paper six cases of appendiceal endometriosis identified in 1480 operated patients whom were made an appendectomy in the Obstetric and Gynecology Institute Medical Academy in Ld during 1977 to 1994. The disease rarely appears and does not show pathognomic symptoms. About 30% cases appeared acute appendicitis symptoms in same author's notes. As a rule it is diagnosed in microscopic examinations of removed appendices. There was also widely discussed foreign medical literature concerning this disease.The accuracy of the modified Alvarado score was assessed prospectively in the preoperative diagnosis of acute appendicitis in children. A consecutive series of 118 patients (54 boys, 64 girls) with acute abdominal pain was studied prospectively over a 6 month period. Appendicitis was confirmed in 38 of 43 children undergoing appendicectomy, giving a false-positive appendicectomy rate of 11.6%. No child under active observation was subsequently found to have a perforated appendix. The overall sensitivity of a modified Alvarado score of > or = 7 was 76.3% and its specificity was 78.8%. Current clinical practice is more accurate than the modified Alvarado score in the diagnosis of acute appendicitis in children.LA results in less postoperative pain and fewer wound infections. The laparoscopic procedure is technically more demanding to perform, resulting in longer operative time.In patients with right iliac fossa (RIF) pain it can be difficult to distinguish between appendicitis and nonspecific abdominal pain (NSAP). In this study we sought to determine whether serum interleukin-6 (IL-6) levels, an early marker of acute inflammation, taken at the time of admission could predict the outcome of patients admitted with RIF pain. Data were collected in a prospective manner on 53 consecutive patients (23 male, 30 female), mean age 22.1 years (range 10-79 years). Nineteen (36%) patients underwent surgery, of whom 16 had appendicitis (histologically proven). The mean (SEM) IL-6 levels (pg/ml) in patients undergoing operation vs those receiving non-operative management were 270.8 (106.3) vs 265.0 (80.4) (P = NS). The mean white blood cell (WBC) counts (x10(9)/l) in these patients were 14.28 (0.81) vs 9.66 (0.67), respectively (P = 0.0002). When patients with a confirmed diagnosis of appendicitis were compared with patients with a diagnosis of NSAP, the IL-6 levels were 149.4 (69.1) vs 363.6 (113.2), respectively (P = NS). In the same groups of patients, the WBC counts were 14.21 (0.81) vs 9.51 (0.68) (P = 0.004). We conclude that IL-6 levels taken at the time of admission are not useful in predicting the outcome of RIF pain.In young women with right lower abdominal pain, laparoscopy can give precise diagnosis and reduce the rate of negative appendectomies.Large epidemiological studies recently published suggest that perforating appendicitis may represent a separate disease entity. To find out whether perforating and nonperforating appendicitis may be distinguished by clinical features (history and examination, lab tests) data from 519 cases of acute appendicitis (17.7% perforations) were analysed, and significant differences were recorded in various aspects of history and clinical examination. It was concluded that perforating and nonperforating appendicitis may clinically be distinguished reliably in the majority of cases.A low risk of bacteraemia exists for both open and laparoscopic appendectomy. This risk did not appear to increase for laparoscopy. Conventional and laparoscopic surgical procedures led to positive peritoneal bacterial cultures after appendectomy in 33% of cases.Plasma serotonin level is a reliable marker of acute appendicitis, especially in the first 48 hours.Three statistical classification methods: discriminant analysis, logistic regression analysis and cluster analysis were compared with the back-propagation neural network algorithm in the diagnosis of acute appendicitis. The differences in the classification accuracy, which were evaluated with the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve were small, though discriminant analysis and back-propagation showed slightly better results than the other methods. The agreement of the methods on the diagnosis increased the accuracy of the classification, so that the number of misclassified cases reduced. The back-propagation neural network offers a good choice for statistical classification methods, but it was not found to be better than them. The use of several methods and their agreement as the basis of the diagnosis seems to give the best results for this diagnostic classification problem.With LA significantly fewer narcotic injections are required and there is a more rapid return to normal activities. LA takes longer to perform and was associated with three intra-abdominal abscesses. In cases of simple acute appendicitis the hospital stay for LA is significantly shorter.Clinical trials are necessary before any conclusion about therapeutic superiority of one or other agent can be drawn.This study demonstrates a small but significant reduction (approximately one day) in post-operative fever, duration of antibiotic treatment, and hospital stay for patients treated with MP compared to those treated with T/C.A prospective, randomized trial was performed to compare open appendectomy with laparoscopic appendectomy in men with a clinical diagnosis of acute appendicitis. Sixty-four patients with a median age of 25 years (range 18-84 years) were randomized to open appendectomy (n = 31) or laparoscopic (n = 33) appendectomy. Of the 64 men, 56 (87.5%) had appendicitis (27 open, 29 laparoscopic procedures). The mean operating times were 50.6 +/- 3.7 minutes (+/- SEM) for open and 58.9 +/- 4.0 minutes for laparoscopic appendectomy (p = 0.13). Five (15%) patients randomized to laparoscopic appendectomy had an open operation. The mean postoperative hospital stay was significantly longer for open appendectomy (3.8 +/- 0.4 days) than for laparoscopic appendectomy (2.9 +/- 0.3 days) (t = 2. 05,df = 62,p = 0.045). The complication rate after open appendectomy (25.8%) was not significantly different from that after laparoscopic appendectomy (12.1%). There was a single postoperative death due to a pulmonary embolus in the laparoscopic group and a single death due to cardiac and renal failure in the open group. The mean time to return to normal activities was significantly longer following open appendectomy (19.7 +/- 2.4 days) than after laparoscopic appendectomy (10.4 +/- 0.9 days), (t = 3.75,df = 49,p = 0.001). In conclusion, laparoscopic appendectomy in men has significant advantages in terms of a more rapid recovery compared to open appendectomy. There were no significant disadvantages to laparoscopic appendectomy compared to open appendectomy.Although modern gastrointestinal surgery has abandoned the invagination of stapler closures, the traditional technique for appendicectomy with appendix stump invagination is still in common use. In a prospective study altogether 200 patients operated on for acute appendicitis were treated either by simple ligation or ligation and inversion of the appendix stump. The complication rates between the two groups were equal. Thus, we recommend the simple ligation technique for conventional as well as for laparoscopic appendicectomy because it is simpler and faster, and it preserves the intact anatomy of the caecal wall.A prospective randomized trial comparing laparoscopic appendectomy with open appendectomy in patients with a diagnosis of acute appendicitis was conducted between October 1992 and April 1994. Of the 158 patients randomized, 7 patients were excluded because of protocol violations (conversion to laparotomy in 4, appendix not removed in 3). The 151 patients randomized to either a laparoscopic (n = 79) or an open appendectomy (n = 72) showed no difference in sex, age, American Society of Anesthesiology (ASA) rating, or previous abdominal surgery. The histologic classification of normal, catarrhal, inflamed, suppurative, and gangrenous appendicitis was not different between the two groups. Conversion from laparoscopic to open appendectomy was necessary in seven patients (9%) who had advanced forms of appendiceal inflammation. When compared to open appendectomy the laparoscopic group had a longer median operating time (63 minutes versus 40 minutes), fewer wound infections (2% versus 11%), less requirement for narcotic analgesia, and an earlier return to normal activity (median 7 days versus 14 days). There was no difference in morbidity, and both groups had a median time to discharge of 3 days. Laparoscopic appendectomy is as safe as open appendectomy; and despite the longer operating time, the advantages such as fewer wound infections and earlier return to normal activity make it a worthwhile alternative for patients with a clinical diagnosis of acute appendicitis.Forty-seven consecutive patients with clinically suspected acute appendicitis were studied at this hospital from June, 1994 to March, 1995. All the patients had received a complete study protocol including: detailed history and physical examination; complete blood cell count with differential count; erythrocyte sedimentation rate; C-reactive protein and sonographic examination. The male to female ratio is 29: 18. The age range is from 4 to 14 years. Thirty patients received laparotomy and 27 were diagnosed as appendicitis by histologic findings including 6 cases of perforated appendicitis. The remaining 3 patients had no evidence of appendicitis histologically. The other 17 patients were observed clinically. In these, the abdominal pain resolved spontaneously, or it was proved due to other diseases. The sensitivity and specificity of these laboratory examinations are: leukocytosis (> 10,000/mm3): 85. 2%, 65%; leukocytosis with a shift-to-the-left (neutrophil > 75%): 81.5%, 70%; elevated ESR (> 20 mm/hr): 40.7%, 85%; elevated CRP (> 0.9 mg/dl): 70.4%, 65%; (> 5 mg/dl); 51.9%, 95%; sonography: 85.2%, 100%. There were 4 false-negative and no false-positive ultrasonographic results in our study. Five of the 6 case of perforated appendicitis had elevated CRP levels of more than 8 mg/dl. In conclusion, detailed history taking and physical examination are still the most reliable tools for diagnosis. For the doubtful cases, sonography can provide excellent specificity and good sensitivity for differential diagnosis. The classical tools of leukocytosis and shift-to-the-left can only provide a screening property but not for diagnosis. CRP was not a good predictor in our study, but it can be a useful parameter when perforated appendicitis is suspected.A complete two-handed technique for laparoscopic appendectomy is described. From April 1992 to July 1994, 100 patients with suspected acute appendicitis were selected to undergo this approach. This technique allows the surgeon to manipulate instruments with both hands for dissecting, transecting and removing the appendix. The appropriate placement of three cannulas in the lower abdominal midline makes this technique possible. Monopolar cautery is used to dissect the mesoappendix and to cauterize the appendicular vessels. Two ligatures are placed at the junction of the appendix with the cecum. The appendix is clamped at its base by ratchet forceps and is extracted along with the forceps immediately after transection. None of the patients selected for this procedure required conversion to open appendectomy. Postoperative complications occurred in four patients, two with umbilical wound infections and two with intra-abdominal abscesses; 12 patients had perforated appendicitis. The results of this study suggest that a complete two-handed laparoscopic appendectomy can be safely and successfully accomplished in patients with suspected acute appendicitis.Right lower abdominal pain is a common problem in the pediatric population. Ultrasonography (US) is a well-accepted imaging modality in the clinical management of this problem. One hundred and six consecutive pediatric patients with right lower abdominal pain were prospectively evaluated. There were 54 boys and 52 girls, with ages ranging from 3 to 15 years (mean: 9.9 years). Final diagnoses were established based on pathological findings or clinical follow-up. US had sensitivity of 90%, specificity of 98%, and accuracy of 94% in the diagnosis of acute appendicitis. Among all true negative cases (n = 55), there was a variety of US findings other than appendiceal abnormality in 21 cases including intestinal and/or mesenteric (n = 19), gallbladder (n = 1), and ovarian (n = 1) abnormalities. All 21 cases were managed medically without complication. We conclude that US of pediatric right lower abdominal pain is a reliable imaging modality not only for the diagnosis of surgical cases but for eliminating the unexpected surgical intervention.Laparoscopic appendectomy is comparable to open appendectomy with regard to complications, hospital stay, cost, return to activity, and return to work. There was a greater operative time involved with the laparoscopic technique. Laparoscopic appendectomy does not offer any significant benefit over the open approach for the routine patient with appendicitis.This is a prospective study on 123 randomly selected patients admitted with the diagnosis of acute appendicitis. The value of rebound tenderness as a clinical diagnostic tool was statistically compared to those of some other physical signs; namely guarding, rigidity and Rovsing's sign. Rebound tenderness was found to carry the highest sensitivity (94.7%), negative predictive value (81.3%), reliability (49.1%), and association with histological diagnosis (P < 0.05). However, its specificity and positive predictive value was not significantly different from those of other physical signs. It is concluded that, in contradistinction to some previously published reports, our study emphasizes the role of rebound tenderness in the clinical diagnosis of acute appendicitis.The results confirm that laparoscopic appendectomy had a longer time of surgery, a shorter hospital stay, and no difference in complications. Further investigation will likely establish that laparoscopic appendectomy can be considered the "gold standard."The WCC did not significantly influence surgical decision-making in the group of patients who were suspected of having acute appendicitis.Antibiotic treatment started during the operation is not significantly worse at preventing infective complications in non-perforated, gangrenous appendicitis than treatment started before the operation.A higher diagnostic accuracy rate is associated with more perforated appendixes. Although perforation itself leads to adverse outcomes, a higher accuracy rate does not. This suggests that hospitals with higher accuracy rates incur more perforations, but, with close observation, timely laparotomy and the use of modern antibiotics, these patients have favourable outcomes. This contrasts with adverse effects of perforation among patients at high risk for perforation (especially very young children and elderly people) in centres at all accuracy levels. The variation in hospitals' diagnostic accuracy rates suggests that some proportion of appendectomies could be safely avoided.Our results indicate that maternal serum creatine kinase can be an important biochemical marker in suspected tubal pregnancy.Laparoscopy has allowed surgeons the ability to perform procedures which result in less postoperative discomfort, earlier return to daily activities, and better cosmesis. For example, laparoscopic cholecystectomy has virtually replaced open cholecystectomy, and many of these operations are performed in the outpatient setting. The role of laparoscopic appendectomy is yet to be defined, however. Over an 18-month period from February 1992 to July 1993, 75 laparoscopic appendectomies were performed at Kaiser Permanente Medical Center in Los Angeles. Thirty-five of the patients undergoing this procedure were outpatients. While there were a total of three complications, including two intraabdominal abscesses, there were no complications in the outpatient appendectomy group. Laparoscopic appendectomy may be safely performed in the outpatient setting in patients with acute nonperforated appendicitis.The original published data seemed to comply with our standardised criteria but evaluation of the scores on our database resulted in poor performances for all of them. Published data seem to be optimistically biased whereas our evaluation gives more realistic estimates of the routine performance in different clinical environments. Further well designed large scale trials are needed to investigate the clinical benefit of diagnostic scoring in acute appendicitis.Acute abdominal pain at the right lower quadrant, with tenderness, rigidity, and increased body temperature (> or = 37.1 degrees C), is indicative of acute appendicitis in patients more than 50 years old. The diagnostic scoring system did perform well, increasing the sensitivity, specificity, efficiency, and usefulness index of the diagnosis of acute appendicitis in the aged.In a randomized study we investigated the effects of antibiotics as the only treatment in acute appendicitis. Forty patients were examined, 19 after antibiotic treatment (one operated due to perforation) and 21 after surgery. All patients were examined prior to randomization, after 10 days and after 30 days. Of the positive ultrasonographic (US) findings, 18 (86%) of the 21 operated patients had histologically proven acute appendicitis. At the 10th day, 9 patients had a seroma under the scar, which had disappeared a month after surgery in all patients. In the 19 patients conservatively treated with antibiotics, the appendix could be visualized in 8 symptom-free cases on the 10th day. In 5 of the 8 patients the appendix was still visualized after 1 month. Three of these 5 had recurrent appendicitis within a year. It is concluded that US can be used not only in diagnosing acute appendicitis, but also in the evaluation of treatments such as antibiotics.The diagnosis of appendicitis remains uncertain in female patients and laparoscopy has been suggested as a valid diagnostic tool. The laparoscopic approach has recently also been proposed for the treatment of acute appendicitis, though its real value is still under debate. A clinical and economic prospective evaluation of laparoscopic surgery over a 1-year period in female patients is reported. The study involved 38 patients presenting with signs of appendicitis and assigned to open (18) or laparoscopic surgery (20). The two groups were comparable as regards age and clinical presentation of the disease. The duration of the procedures was similar (60 min). Morbidity was comparable (3 vs 2). The ratio of negative appendectomy (50% vs 44%) was also similar, but the laparoscopic approach enabled a higher number of certain diagnoses (9/10 vs 3/8 p > 0.05). No significant differences were observed in the median postoperative stay (3 days for laparoscopy and 4 for surgery) or in the days needed to return to normal activity (15 vs 18). The cosmetic satisfaction was higher for the laparoscopic patients. The cost of the laparoscopic approach, however, was much higher than for conventional surgery. Our results suggest that laparoscopy is a useful diagnostic tool in female patients, but that laparoscopic appendectomy should be considered with some caution in times of restricted financial resources.Laparoscopic appendectomy appears to have distinct advantages over open appendectomy. The laparoscopic procedures produced less pain and allowed more rapid return to full activities, and LAS required shorter hospital stays. The only disadvantages to the laparoscopic approach were slightly increased operative time for both procedures, and increased emesis following LAL.In a prospective controlled study the effect of antibiotics as the only treatment in acute appendicitis was evaluated. Of 40 patients admitted with a duration of abdominal pain of less than 72 h, 20 received antibiotics intravenously for 2 days followed by oral treatment for 8 days and 20 considered as controls were randomized to surgery. All patients treated conservatively were discharged within 2 days, except one who required surgery after 12 h because of peritonitis secondary to perforated appendicitis. Seven patients were readmitted within 1 year as a result of recurrent appendicitis and underwent surgery, when appendicitis was confirmed. The diagnostic accuracy within the operated group was 85 per cent. One patient had perforated appendicitis at operation. Antibiotic treatment in patients with acute appendicitis was as effective as surgery. The patients had less pain and required less analgesia, but the recurrence rate was high.This large series, from a large number of hospitals, with multiple practitioners, can serve as a community standard for pediatric appendectomy in the 1990s.Two groups of 30 women with clinical signs of appendicitis were randomized to immediate appendicectomy or diagnostic laparoscopy. In the latter group, appendicectomy was performed if a diagnosis of acute appendicitis was established or if the appendix could not be visualized. Eleven patients who underwent immediate operation had unnecessary appendicectomy, compared with two who underwent laparoscopy. This difference of 30% (95% confidence interval 11-49%) was significant (p = 0.01). There was no significant difference in postoperative morbidity rate in the two groups. Diagnostic laparoscopy is a useful preliminary investigation in women with clinical signs of acute appendicitis.Single-dose cefotetan and multiple-dose cefoxitin are equally effective. However, because of the greater convenience and markedly decreased cost, single-dose cefotetan is the prophylaxis of choice in appendectomy for nonperforated appendicitis.A total of 231 children with acute appendicitis were treated at our hospitals during the 10 years between 1984 and 1993, 53 of whom had a perforated appendix. These 53 patients were randomly assigned to two groups at the time of surgery according to the different procedures performed. Thus, 29 children were managed by appendectomy followed by peritoneal lavage using a large amount of saline, and intravenous antibiotic therapy consisting of aminoglycoside and cephem (lavage group), while the other 24 children were treated by appendectomy with silicon tube drainage and the same systemic antibiotic therapy (drainage group). The mean length of hospitalization, and the mean durations of fever and the need for fasting after laparotomy in the lavage group were significantly less than those in the drainage group: 10.1 versus 18.8 days, 2.8 versus 7.7 days, and 1.8 versus 3.5 days, respectively. The operation wounds healed well in the lavage group due to the fact that there was no drain. Wound infections occurred in two children from the lavage group and six from the drainage group. Intra-abdominal abscesses occurred in two children from the drainage group. Accordingly, peritoneal lavage appears to be superior to intraperitoneal tube drainage for the management of perforated appendicitis in children.Laparoscopic appendectomy is an attractive option for the surgical treatment of acute appendicitis. When performed by an experienced laparoscopist, the procedure can be accomplished with little variation in time from the standard open technique, provide a superior cosmetic result, shorter hospital stay and a significant reduction in postoperative pain and length of convalescence. In this study a comparison of 42 open appendectomies and 37 laparoscopic appendectomies was made in regard to age, sex, length of stay, cost of stay, and length of convalescence.We compared aspoxicillin, a new broad-spectrum penicillin derivative, with piperacillin in severe abdominal infection. Aspoxicillin 4 g administered tds (n = 52) or piperacillin 4 g qds (n = 53) usually as monotherapy were randomly given to patients suffering from perforated appendicitis, acute cholecystitis, ulcer or colon perforation, or intra-abdominal abscess. Blood, tissue and exudate cultures were obtained when applicable for pathogen identification and susceptibility testing. The efficacy rates were similar in the two study groups. Of the 50 evaluable aspoxicillin patients 45 (90%) were considered as treatment responders compared with 48 patients out of 53 (91%) in the piperacillin group (NS). The 95% confidence interval for the efficacy difference was -12% to +11% thus showing no difference between the two drugs. Both drugs were generally well tolerated and no serious drug-related adverse events were noted. However, five patients died because of their illness and one patient had a fatal myocardial infarction. In conclusion, aspoxicillin 4 g tds was shown to be equal to piperacillin 4 g qds in severe abdominal infections.Fifty-six patients with possible appendicitis were evaluated clinically and by ultrasound. Ultrasound examination visualized the appendix in 18 of the patients evaluated and showed another pathology in six others. It was useful when the clinical picture was not clear (25 patients) as it showed an inflamed appendix in 10 patients. This was of particular value when there was another critical illness making clinical evaluation difficult (three patients), and for the diagnosis of other unsuspected pathological conditions (six patients). It did not affect the line of management when the clinical picture was clear enough to diagnose or exclude acute appendicitis.1) Initial conservative management of patients with appendiceal abscess/phlegmon is prudent, safe, and effective. 2) Interval laparoscopic appendectomy can be performed safely and effectively.The immune status was studied during the development of the disease in 182 children who were operated on for acute appendicitis. T lymphocytes and their subpopulations circulating in the blood, as well as B lymphocytes, immunoglobulins A, M, G, and immune complexes were determined. The character of changes of these values before the operation and in various postoperative periods were determined. The effect of complex treatment, including T-activin, on the clinical and immunological parameters in children with acute appendicitis was appraised. Analysis of the results showed that a transitory immunodepressive state forms in children with the disease, which is more marked in the destructive form, with normalization of the main values of cell-mediated and humoral immunity by the 7th day after appendectomy. In a complicated course of acute appendicitis the state of immunodeficiency is torpid in character and does not return to normal values even after clinical recovery, i.e. before discharge from the clinic. Inclusion of the immunostimulating agent T-activin into the complex treatment of patients with appendicitis ensures a more rapid involution of the main clinical manifestations of the disease. The therapeutic effect was most pronounced in destructive appendicitis: after 3 days of treatment the pain syndrome was encountered twice less frequently and intestinal paresis more than twice less frequently in these patients, and the term of hospital stay (8.8 +/- 0.4 days) was less shorter than for children of the control group (12.2 +/- 1.9 days) who did not receive T-activin in the therapeutic complex.To determine the informative significance of the myoglobin test for prognosticating the postoperative complications in children treated by surgery for acute appendicitis, the authors compared the content of serum myoglobin in patients with a favorable (31 children) and in those with a complicated (12 children) course of the postoperative period. The detected peculiarities of the initial (at the time of the operative intervention) myoglobin level and its changes in the first two postoperative days allowed the possibility of the development of postoperative pyoinflammatory complications to be predicted with an accuracy of up to 75%.Lavage of the surgical wound with physiologic serum may be an effective, safe and inexpensive method to prevent infection of the wound following appendicectomy for unperforated appendicitis.The possibilities of ultrasonic examination in the diagnosis of acute appendicitis are analysed. The ultrasonic parameters are systematized on the basis of examination of 76 patients with various forms of acute inflammation of the vermiform process and of 16 healthy individuals. Exosemeiotics of acute appendicitis is presented. The high significance of USE in complex examination of patients with suspected acute inflammation of the vermiform process difficult for diagnosis is shown. This was confirmed by the results of complex examination of 151 patients with various urgent pathological conditions whose clinical symptomatology was similar to that of acute appendicitis. It was found that USE improves the diagnostics in difficult clinical cases and lessens the number of diagnostic and tactical errors. The wide use of ultrasonic examination in the daily practice of surgical clinics is recommended.Fifty-three patients aged 13 to 48 years (mean 27.5 years) underwent appendicectomy for acute non-perforated appendicitis in Benin city or Asaba, Nigeria, between November 1990 and December 1992 and did not receive intravenous fluids at any stage. Postoperatively, they were started on oral hydration as soon as they recovered fully from anaesthesia. Two (3.8%) patients vomited postoperatively but this did not significantly interfere with their oral hydration. Six (11.4%) patients developed wound infection. All the patients were discharged within 48 hours. Routine use of intravenous fluids in appendicectomy for non-perforated appendicitis is unnecessary and wasteful. It should be used only in selected cases.Patients who underwent laparoscopic appendectomies have a shorter duration of analgesic use and return to full activities sooner postoperatively when compared with patients who underwent open appendectomies. The authors consider laparoscopic appendectomy to be the procedure of choice in patients with acute appendicitis.Though laparoscopic appendectomy started endoscopic surgery in general surgery, it has yet not reached the acceptance as is the case with cholecystectomy. The application of this technique in possibly bland appendices and reports that the technique was accompanied by severe complications, increases the scepticism about it. This made us decide to start a randomized controlled trial: laparoscopic vs. conventional appendectomy. More than 1000 endoscopic interventions mainly performed at the gallbladder and the stomach and 165 prospectively documented and partly treated patients with acute appendicitis were the basis to start this trial. "Acute Appendicitis" was diagnosed on the basis of clinical symptoms by means of the computer-aided questionnaire of the EC-study "Acute Abdominal Pain", a self-developed validated diagnostic score, the macroscopic findings and the careful assessment of the histology of the resected appendix. Beside the technical feasibility, principle end-points were mainly intensity and course of postoperative pain measured by means of the Visual Analogue Scale (VAS) in lying, standing and moving position and the postoperative consumption of analgesics. We assessed a difference of 15 points on the VAS as clinically relevant. Of 57 patients with acute appendicitis we performed open appendectomy in 23 and laparoscopy in 34 patients according to randomization. In 9 patients of the laparoscopy group it was necessary to change over to open appendectomy for different reasons resulting in a direct comparison of 25 laparoscopies versus 23 open appendectomies. There were no differences between sociodemographic and preclinical data in both groups.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)A randomized prospective study of antibiotic prophylaxis using a single dose of either cefoxitin or piperacillin is presented. The trial was carried out in Al Ain Hospital in the period 1989-1992 on 250 adult patients with non-perforated appendicitis. One group (124 patients) received 2 g cefoxitin, the other group (126 patients) 2 g piperacillin. Antibiotics were administered intravenously in the operating theatre immediately before surgery. Wound infection occurred in three patients, 2.4% of the cefoxitin group and in five patients (4%) of the second group (with no significant difference). The commonest infecting organisms were Escherichia coli (5 out of 8). Mean hospital stay for patients with wound infection was 15 days (range 12-21) compared with 6 days, (range 4-8) for non-infected cases. Prophylactic cefoxitin or piperacillin were each therefore similarly effective in minimizing the rate of wound infections in patients with non-perforated appendicitis.A prospective study of 200 consecutive patients with suspected acute appendicitis was performed to compare open and laparoscopic appendicectomy. Formal randomization was precluded by instrument availability. Some 100 patients underwent laparoscopic appendicectomy (conversion to laparotomy was carried out in five) and 100 had conventional surgery. The groups were similar in sex ratio, age, degree of appendiceal inflammation and antibiotic treatment. The mean duration of open appendicectomy was 46 min and of the laparoscopic procedure 51 min (P not significant). Postoperative complications in patients who underwent laparoscopic appendicectomy included: intra-abdominal abscess (two patients), wound infection (one), early bowel obstruction (four; all resolved with medical treatment) and umbilical haematoma (two). There were no reoperations in the immediate or late postoperative period. Complications after open operation were: wound infection (seven patients) (P < 0.05), early bowel obstruction (five; three resolved with medical treatment, two required surgery) and haematoma of the surgical wound (one). The mean hospital stay was 4.8 days for laparoscopic appendicectomy and 6.0 days for the open operation (P < 0.05). There were no deaths.Serum C-reactive protein was measured in 56 patients hospitalized with a suspected diagnosis of acute appendicitis. Based on these determinations, four groups of patients were defined: Group A = 26 patients with acute appendicitis who had a C-reactive protein level higher than 2.5 mg/dl. Group B = 4 patients with a C-reactive protein level lower than 2.5 mg/dl who, after surgery based on a presumed diagnosis of acute appendicitis, were found to have a normal appendix. Group C = 22 patients with nonspecific abdominal pain, 18 (72 percent) of whom had an elevated C-reactive protein level, although in only 4 (7.1 percent) were these levels higher than 2.5 percent mg/dl. Group D = 4 patients who had diseases other than acute appendicitis. It is concluded that an increase in C-reactive protein levels to more than 2.5 mg/dl is not a definite indicator of acute appendicitis. However, if the C-reactive protein level in blood drawn 12 hours after the onset of symptoms is less than 2.5 mg/dl, acute appendicitis can be excluded.Laparoscopy is a safe and effective way of diagnosing acute appendicitis and should be used more often.The intensity of heat emission stream was studied up in 204 patients with an acute appendicitis, acute cholecystitis, hernia in the region of the planned incision line before the operation and on the second, fourth, sixth, eighth day after its conduction. The precise diagnostic distinctions were obtained about the heat stream level in uncomplicated cases and when infiltrate and abscess formation occur. This distinctions appear much more earlier than the classical inflammation features.A study was carried out of 137 patients with a diagnosis of acute appendicitis who were randomized to either laparoscopic or open appendicectomy. Patients found to have perforated or normal appendices at histological examination were excluded. Fifty-two patients undergoing laparoscopic appendicectomy and those receiving 57 open procedures were analysed. Laparoscopic appendicectomy took no longer than the open procedure (mean 43 versus 40 min). The number of doses of pethidine (1 mg per kg body-weight) required in the immediate postoperative period did not differ between the two groups but the mean number of doses of oral analgesic (naproxen sodium 550 mg twice daily) required was less in patients undergoing laparoscopic appendicectomy (2.8 versus 5.0, P < 0.05). There was no significant difference between time to resumption of fluid and diet intake and length of hospital stay. There were five (9 per cent) wound infections after open appendicectomy compared with none after the laparoscopic operation (P < 0.01). Patients who underwent laparoscopy returned to full home (17 versus 30 days, P < 0.01) and social (19 versus 32 days, P < 0.05) activities earlier than those who underwent open operation. Laparoscopic appendicectomy may allow reduction in the number of wound infections and earlier return to normal activities.The diagnosis of acute appendicitis is usually made from the history and physical examination. Recently, abdominal ultrasonography (US), laparoscopy, computerized tomography (CT), and barium enema (BE) have been used in the preoperative evaluation of patients with presumed appendicitis in order to improve the diagnostic accuracy. However, the usefulness of these tests in verifying the diagnosis of appendicitis has not been established. We reviewed the medical records of 203 patients who underwent appendectomy. One hundred patients were surgically treated before 1984 (group I) and 103 patients underwent surgery after 1988 (group II). Patients in group II were more likely to have preoperative US, laparoscopy, CT, or BE (24 in group II versus 3 in group I, p < 0.05). When groups I and II were compared, the rates of perforation (27% versus 20%), normal appendectomy (8% versus 11%), and the interval between admission and operation (12.2 hours versus 10.7 hours) and length of hospitalization (5.0 days versus 5.1 days) were not significantly different. We concluded that although adjunctive testing may be beneficial in selected patients, its routine use in patients suspected of having appendicitis cannot be advocated at present.Antimicrobial resistance of operative site flora was correlated with postoperative infection in 175 patients undergoing operation for intra-abdominal sepsis: Diagnoses for study patients were acute or gangrenous appendicitis in 48 (27%), complicated appendicitis in 98 (56%), perforated viscus other than appendix in 21 (12%), and eight (5%) had other intra-abdominal infections. One hundred thirty-six (78%) patients were males. The average age was 33 +/- 14 years, average number of hospital days was 11.6 +/- 13.5, and average number of days on antibiotics was 6.9 +/- 2.5. Overall recovery without infection was 75 per cent (131/175). Analysis of susceptibility of 939 intraoperative isolates indicated a significant relationship (P = 0.0002) between resistance to the empiric antimicrobials received and postoperative infection. Of 131 patients with resolution of the intra-abdominal infection, 57 (44%) had resistant isolates while 36 (82%) of 44 patients with postoperative infectious complications had resistant isolates. Streptococcus Group D, Escherichia coli, and Bacteroides fragilis were the most prevalent resistant organisms isolated from both intra- and postoperative cultures. Other variables that were significantly different between those without complications and those who had complications were, respectively: average age 31 versus 38; admission WBC 14.5 versus 16.7; and diagnosis, acute appendicitis 28 per cent versus 2 per cent. A stepwise logistic regression analysis confirmed the predictive value of intraoperative isolate resistance, age, and admission WBC, in that order, on outcome.Randomised assessment of new laparoscopic surgical techniques is difficult. Surgeons need time to become experienced with the methods and tend, when they have experience, to favour one or other approach. We have carried out a prospective randomised comparison of laparoscopic and conventional appendicectomy done by surgeons of comparable experience in patients with suspected acute appendicitis. Postoperative management decisions were made by surgeons other than the operating surgeon. 140 patients were randomly assigned to open (OA) or laparoscopic (LA) appendicectomy (70 each). The age, sex ratio, duration of symptoms, and proportion of patients with histologically confirmed appendicitis was similar in the two groups. Operating time was longer for LA than for OA (mean 70.3 [SD 21.9] vs 46.5 [25.9] min; p < 0.001). There were no major intraoperative complications in either group. 14 (20%) patients in the LA group required conversion to an open operation. No significant differences between the groups were found postoperatively for pain score, analgesic requirement, time to reintroduction of diet, or hospital stay. 46 LA patients and 42 OA patients attended follow-up 3 weeks after surgery. Similar proportions had returned to work (36 [79%] vs 31 [74%]). The frequency of wound complications and wound pain after leaving hospital was lower after LA but not significantly so. We conclude that the postoperative course after LA and conventional OA does not differ significantly.The clinical safety and efficacy of imipenem/cilastatin in the treatment of intra-abdominal infections was compared with the combination of aztreonam and clindamycin in a randomized prospective trial. The severity of illness was determined by means of the Apache II score and a fixed outcome reporting scheme was used. One hundred and four patients were entered into the study, of whom 80 were evaluable. Forty-two patients were treated with imipenem/cilastatin (500 + 500 mg qds) and 38 with aztreonam (600 tds) and clindamycin (1000 mg tds). The study groups were comparable for age and sex. The imipenem/cilastatin group differed from the aztreonam and clindamycin group in having significantly more patients with the diagnosis of acute appendicitis (P < 0.01) and a significantly lower mean Apache score (P < 0.05). The predominate microorganisms isolated in both groups were Escherichia coli and Bacteroides fragilis. Treatment with imipenem/cilastatin proved successful in 71% and failed in 24%, and initial success only was seen in 5%. The numbers in the group treated with aztreonam and clindamycin were 64%, 29% and 7% respectively. Severity of illness, as measured by Apache II score, had no influence on the study outcome. Imipenem/cilastatin as well as the combination of aztreonam and clindamycin were effective in the treatment of abdominal infections and no major adverse reactions were seen.Laparoscopic appendectomy is emerging as a popular treatment modality for acute appendicitis. Although claims have been made to potential superiority over traditional appendectomy, comparisons of operative difficulty, hospital stay, hospital costs, complication rates, postoperative pain, and convalescence have not been well studied. Two hundred consecutive patients presenting with signs and symptoms of acute appendicitis underwent appendectomy. Traditional appendectomy was employed in 101 patients, while 99 underwent laparoscopy. Successful laparoscopic appendectomy was possible in 89 patients who were compared with the 101 patients with traditional appendectomy. There were two pregnant patients with appendicitis in each group. The incidence of acute appendicitis was 72 per cent for traditional appendectomy and 74 per cent for laparoscopic appendectomy. Operating time was significantly longer with laparoscopic appendectomy (60.1 vs 45.4 minutes, P = 0.0001). This was reflected in higher (although not significant) hospital costs ($8,683 vs $6,213). Post-op hospital stay was shorter for laparoscopic appendectomy (2.7 vs 3.8 days, P = 0.001). Complication rates were no different between the two groups. Post-op pain, as evaluated by a patient grading scale, was less for laparoscopic appendectomies up to the third post-op week (P = 0.003). The amount of IM pain medication was greater with traditional appendectomy (P = 0.009). Convalescence was significantly shorter with laparoscopic appendectomy as measured by: 1) return to normal household activity (7.8 vs 13.2 days, P = 0.016), 2) returned ability to exercise (19.7 vs 29.0 days, P = 0.009), 3) patient feeling well enough to return to work (14.1 vs 19.2 days, P = 0.032), and 4) actual return to work (15.4 vs 20.5 days, P = 0.038).(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Two groups of 30 women with clinical signs of appendicitis were randomized to immediate appendicectomy or diagnostic laparoscopy. In the latter group, appendicectomy was performed if a diagnosis of acute appendicitis was established or if the appendix could not be visualized. Eleven patients undergoing immediate operation had unnecessary appendicectomy, compared with two having laparoscopy. This difference of 30 per cent (95 per cent confidence interval 11-49 per cent) was significant (P = 0.01). There was no significant difference in postoperative morbidity rate in the two groups. Diagnostic laparoscopy is a useful preliminary investigation in women with clinical signs of acute appendicitis.A total of 155 consecutive patients with suspected acute appendicitis were studied to compare laparoscopic and conventional operations. Patients were not randomized: laparoscopy was performed when a suitably trained surgeon and laparoscopic instruments were available. Laparoscopic appendicectomy was attempted in 51 patients and was successful in 46 (90 per cent); all conversions to open operation were because of marked inflammatory adhesions around the appendix. There were no intraoperative complications. Reintroduction of normal diet and discharge from hospital occurred earlier after laparoscopic than open surgery (P < 0.05). The requirement for analgesia after successful laparoscopic surgery was less than that after conventional appendicectomy, but the difference was not significant. The incidence of wound infection was reduced after the laparoscopic procedure (P = 0.06). It is concluded that laparoscopic appendicectomy is practical and may have advantages over conventional operation, although a randomized study is necessary.The standard treatment for an appendiceal mass is conservative therapy followed by appendectomy after 6 to 10 weeks. With the advent of antibiotics designed to prevent the growth of anaerobes, early appendectomy can now be carried out without complication. The authors studied 56 patients with appendiceal mass formation, 26 (group A) treated conventionally and 30 (group B) treated by early appendectomy. In group B, the infection rate was 17%, the mean operating time was 38.7 minutes, the mean hospital stay was 15 days and there was an early return to work. The corresponding parameters for group A were an infection rate of 8%, a mean operating time of 35.2 minutes, a hospital stay of 19.1 days and a late return to work. Furthermore, 15% of the patients in group A had a recurrent acute episode during the waiting period. Overall, early appendectomy appears to be a safe and cost-effective treatment for appendiceal mass formation.Augmentin as single agent was compared to the combination of metronidazole/gentamicin in the prevention of sepsis after appendicectomy. Two hundred patients admitted to Riyadh Central Hospital with a clinical diagnosis of acute appendicitis were enrolled in a prospective randomized study. All patients had a preoperative chest X ray, CBC, urinalysis and any other necessary investigations. Patients received either drug regime intravenously, 30 min prior to surgery. The overall incidence of wound infections in the Augmentin group was 8% as compared to 14% in the metronidazole/gentamicin group. There were no intra-abdominal abscesses in either group. Patients with perforated or gangrenous appendices received a 3- to 5-day course of treatment. All the early wound infection (2-4 days after operation) occurred in patients with gangrenous or perforated appendices. The results were studied statistically using chi 2 and there was no statistically significant difference between the infection rates in the two treatment groups whatever the state of the appendix at operation. Augmentin is as effective and well-tolerated as metronidazole/gentamicin in the prevention of wound infection following appendicectomy. The ease of administration of one drug with added anti-anaerobic property makes Augmentin superior to the tested combination.In a series of 187 patients with acute abdominal pain syndrome, 65 young women reported non specific pain in right iliac or pelvic area. A controlled study compared 33 patients with immediate laparoscopy and 32 explored with a laboratory contrast or imaging approach. In the laparoscopic group, an exact diagnosis was made in 97% of the patients, allowing in 2/3 of cases the endoscopic treatment. Only 28% in the second group had an exact diagnosis. Hospital stay was shorter in the laparoscopic group (4.18 vs 6.16 days; p = 0.01) decreasing the hospital cost. The authors suggest that immediate laparoscopy should be performed in young women presenting with non-specific abdominal pain.This prospective randomized study shows that laparoscopic appendectomy is superior to open appendectomy in terms of hospital stay, postoperative complications, and return to normal activities and is recommended as the approach of choice in the management of acute appendicitis.A prospective evaluation of laparoscopic surgery for acute appendicitis over a 6-month period is reported. Sixty-five patients with signs and symptoms of appendicitis necessitating surgery were assigned to open (n = 36) or laparoscopic (n = 29) appendicectomy. Thirty-seven patients were female (22 open) and 28 were male (14 open). The median age was 24 (range 14-64) years for open appendicectomy and 18 (range 14-60) years for the laparoscopic procedure. The mean postoperative stay for open operation was 4.8 (range 1-21) days and for the laparoscopic route 2.2 (range 1-11) days (P < 0.05). Inflammation was confirmed histologically in 72 per cent of the open cases and in 74 per cent of the laparoscopic cases (P not significant). The wound infection rate was 11 per cent (n = 4) for open and 4 per cent (n = 1) for laparoscopic appendicectomy (P < 0.05). The median anaesthesia time was 52 (range 15-90) min for open appendicectomy and 48 (range 20-120) min for laparoscopic surgery (P not significant). After open appendicectomy patients had a median of 5 (range 2-12) intramuscular injections of analgesia compared with a median of 1 (range 0-5) in the laparoscopic group (P < 0.05). Two laparoscopic operations were converted to an open procedure. The results suggest that emergency laparoscopic appendicectomy should be explored further as an alternative to open surgery for acute appendicitis.In a controlled, prospective study the following five criteria were used for the diagnosis and management of acute appendicitis: abdominal pain; vomiting; right lower quadrant tenderness; low grade fever (< or = 38.8 degrees C); and polymorphonuclear leucocytosis (TC > or = 10,000 with polymorphs > or = 75%). The aim of the study was to reduce the negative appendicectomy rate. If four out of five or five out of five criteria were present on admission, appendicectomy was carried out. On the other hand, if three out of five criteria were present on admission, the patient was subjected to active inpatient observation until either the development of the fourth criterion, when appendicectomy was performed, or until the patient recovered and the condition did not progress beyond the third criterion. Generalised peritonitis due to a perforated appendix was excluded from the study. Over a 1-year period, 58 patients (M:F = 45:13) were entered into the study. Appendicectomy was carried out in 46 (80%) of patients; of these, 32 patients (70%) were operated on soon after admission. The remaining 14 (30%) were operated on after a period of inpatient observation decided the development of the fourth criterion. A total of 12 patients (12/58 = 20%) did not undergo operation. The control group consisted of 59 patients upon whom appendicectomy was carried out by another surgical unit over the same 1-year period. The negative appendicectomy rate in the trial group was 6.5% (3/46), whereas in the control group it was 17% (10/59) (P < 0.05). We conclude that the use of a simple scoring system can significantly reduce the negative appendicectomy rate.The efficacy of imipenem-cilastatin was compared with that of tobramycin and metronidazole for the treatment of appendicitis-associated abdominal infections in children in an open, randomized trial. Two hundred eighteen patients between 2.5 and 16.8 years of age hospitalized for appendectomy because of suspected acute appendicitis were allocated to 5 treatment groups. The appendix was perforated in 54 (33.8%) of the 160 cases with appendicitis. All patients responded favorably to treatment. Infection in the wound occurred in 15 of 125 (12.0%) of those without preoperative antibiotic therapy and in 5 of 83 (6.0%) of those given imipenem preoperatively (P = 0.12; 95% confidence interval, -2.2 to 14.2%). C-reactive protein decreased significantly faster in those with perforated appendix treated with imipenem than in those treated with tobramycin and metronidazole (58.2 mg/liter vs. 89.4 mg/liter, P less than 0.05 on the third postoperative day). Imipenem-cilastatin was at least as effective and economically comparable as tobramycin and metronidazole for the treatment of appendicitis-associated infections in children.One hundred patients who had appendicectomy for uncomplicated acute appendicitis over 1 year were randomly allocated to two groups of 50 patients each. Patients in group 1 had a single prophylactic injection of gentamicin while those in group 2 had a five days course with the first dose given just before the operation. There was no wound infection in any of the patients in either groups. There was also no statistically significant difference in the incidence of other postoperative complications. These findings suggest that a single prophylactic dose of gentamicin was as effective as a five days course in preventing postoperatively complications, like wound infection.Simple ligation facilitates and shortens appendectomy. It is a safe procedure, preventing deformation of the caecal wall and possibly reducing the risk of postoperative ileus due to adhesions. We therefore recommend simple ligation as the standard procedure at appendectomy.A prospective, randomized, clinical study was done to evaluate the place of prophylactic antibiotics in uncomplicated childhood appendicitis. One hundred patients with uncomplicated appendicitis were randomly assigned to one of four groups, each consisting of 25 cases. Group 1 patients did not receive prophylactic antibiotic. Group 2, group 3, and group 4 patients received ornidazole, penicillin plus tobramycin, and piperacillin, respectively. The use of prophylactic antibiotics did not yield better results than the use of placebos. The rarity of infectious complications after uncomplicated appendicectomy may be unique for children. Although the need for antibiotic prophylaxis is well documented in adults, the rarity of infectious complications makes it highly questionable in the treatment of uncomplicated appendicitis in children.In a 3-year study, 103 children with acute non-perforated appendicitis who underwent appendicectomy were randomized for either a single preoperative dose of gentamicin and metronidazole or three doses of gentamicin and metronidazole given before and after the operation. The overall wound infection rate was 1.9%. There was no significant difference between wound infection rates of the single-dose group (2.1%) and the three-dose group (1.8%). The mean(s.d.) hospital stays of the single-dose and three-dose groups were similar: 6.6(2.2) days and 6.4(2.7) days. This study shows that a single preoperative dose of gentamicin and metronidazole is as effective as three doses of gentamicin and metronidazole in the control of post-appendicectomy wound sepsis.Twenty-one patients with a clinical diagnosis of acute appendicitis underwent graded compression ultrasonography as an ongoing clinical study. The findings at surgery were compared with the ultrasonographic findings. There were no false-positive, 8 false-negative, 9 true-positive, and 11 true-negative results. The specificity was 100% and sensitivity, 52.9% The findings of this study, in contrast to findings of other recently reported studies, demonstrates that ultrasonography is a poor modality with which to evaluate acute appendicitis.A clinical study on cefuzonam (CZON), a new parenteral cephalosporin antibiotic, was performed in 22 patients with acute appendicitis. CZON in a dose of 1 g was administered by intravenous bolus injection or intravenous drip infusion for 60 minutes. In the appendices, concentrations of CZON were 0.066-21.7 micrograms/g in normal or slight catarrhal cases, 0.173-11.7 micrograms/g in moderate phlegmous cases and 0.116-12.1 micrograms/g in serious gangrenous perforated cases. The concentration of CZON in appendixes was not directly proportional to the degree of pathological change of inflammation. 6 patients with acute peritonitis due to perforated appendicitis were treated with CZON of 2 g/day for 5-10 days. The clinical effect was good in 5 cases, fair in 1 case of the above 6. The clinical efficacy rate was 83%. Side effects were not notable in the patients.The authors present a retrospective analysis of 465 pediatric laparoscopic appendectomies. The ages of these patients ranged from 3 to 16 years, with a mean age of 10 years. The diagnosis of acute appendicitis was based on one or more of the following: the initial or repeated physical examination, abdominal radiographs, leukocyte blood count, and ultrasonography. On gross examination, 90% of appendices appeared inflamed, while on microscopic examination, 93% showed evidence of acute inflammation. There was a 3.6% incidence of minor intraoperative incidents and a 3.0% postoperative complication rate with 1.3% of patients requiring a subsequent laparotomy or repeat laparoscopic procedure. There were no deaths. The advantages of laparoscopic appendectomy include easy and rapid localization of the appendix, regardless of its location, the ability to explore the entire abdominal cavity through the same laparoscopic portals used for appendix removal, the ability to lavage completely the contaminated peritoneal cavity, a reduction in the incidence of intraperitoneal abscesses, and a probable reduction in postoperative adhesions. In addition, laparoscopic appendectomy is associated with less cutaneous scarring and a more rapid return of intestinal function and normal activities. In our experience, these results are better than those obtained with classical surgery.Between 1.7. 1988-31. 12. 1989 in 18 surgical departments of the former GDR 6, 266 patients suffering from "appendicitis" were registered and qualitatively evaluated. The perforation rate was 8.3%. 30% of these patients had no typical diagnosis. Postoperative lethality was 0.32%.A prospective randomized clinical trial was performed to determine the efficiency of single-dose antibiotic prophylaxis in preventing septic complications after appendectomy. The infection rate increased significantly in the control group without antibiotic prophylaxis (9.3% to 20.3%). Older patients with severe appendicitis had more advantages from the prophylaxis than younger one. We have suggested to perform antibiotic prophylaxis individually only in those patients with high risk of septic complications after appendectomy.An open-label prospective study was performed employing intramuscularly administered imipenem as an adjunct to surgery in 20 patients with acute cholecystitis and 24 patients with perforated or gangrenous appendicitis. Three (12.5%) septic failures occurred in appendicitis patients and 2 (10%) failures in cholecystitis patients. There were no deaths. Adverse effects were minor, and there was no toxicity. Although failures were not associated with in vitro resistance, Pseudomonas spp. were recovered from 2 of 3 appendicitis failures. Intramuscular imipenem appeared to be an effective single-drug antimicrobial when used as an adjunct to surgery in patients with acute cholecystitis or perforated appendicitis. It should be a more cost-effective alternative to the current multiple-drug therapy frequently employed in patients with intra-abdominal sepsis.Over an 18-month period, 100 consecutive patients who underwent appendicectomy were randomly allocated to have skin closure either by interrupted transdermal or subcuticular techniques. Ninety cases were performed as emergencies within 6 h of admission. Only cases of acute uncomplicated appendicitis were included. Complications arising from the method of wound closure used were assessed. It was noted that the mean wound closure time and cost of material were significantly reduced in the group using the subcuticular technique (P less than 0.025). The wound infection rate was the same in both groups, but when all wound complications were taken together, there was a significantly higher incidence with the interrupted method. The results from this trial indicate that subcuticular wound closure during appendicectomy--an operation with a high risk of infection--is not associated with an increase in the incidence of wound complications and offers a cost and time-saving advantage.Two hundred forty-six patients with acute appendicitis were randomly assigned to one of two groups. One group of 120 patients received systemic clindamycin preoperatively. Another group of 126 patients received, in addition to systemic clindamycin, a solution of topical ampicillin applied to subcutaneous tissues. No differences were found in the characteristics of the two groups. Combined prophylaxis with clindamycin and ampicillin significantly reduced wound infection to 4%, compared with clindamycin alone (p less than 0.02). A decrease in the surgical wound infection rate in the group treated with clindamycin and ampicillin was mainly observed in patients with advanced (gangrenous and perforated) appendicitis (p less than 0.05). A significant decrease in wound infection rates in patients with positive culture results was also found. We conclude that prophylaxis with a combination of systemic clindamycin and topical ampicillin solution, when compared with clindamycin alone, more effectively prevents wound infection after emergency appendectomy, especially in patients with serious wound contamination.The diagnostic accuracy and practical impact of high-resolution sonography were prospectively studied in 523 consecutive patients admitted to the hospital with suspected appendicitis. The criteria for ultrasound diagnosis of acute appendicitis included visualization of a noncompressible aperistaltic appendix, with a targetlike appearance in transverse view and a diameter greater than or equal to 7 mm. In 115 of 130 patients with proven appendicitis the inflamed appendix or appendiceal abscess could be visualized, giving a sensitivity of 88.5%. The mean diameter of ultrasonically visible appendices was 11.4 +/- 3.2 mm. The overall accuracy and specificity of sonography in the diagnosis of acute appendicitis were 95.7% and 98%, respectively. The predictive value of a positive test was 94.5% and that of a negative result 96.3%. In a separate analysis of the results in 121 women of childbearing age, who have a high risk of preoperative misdiagnosis, the overall accuracy was found to be 96.7%, with 82.6% sensitivity and 100% specificity. Twenty-four (89%) of the 27 patients with appendiceal rupture (incidence 20.8%) were correctly diagnosed with ultrasound. The other 3 cases (11%) were missed. Routine use of ultrasonography has significantly improved the diagnostic accuracy in patients with suspected appendicitis and has reduced the negative laparotomy rate from 22.9% to 13.2%.Acute appendicitis continues as a medical challenge with newer approaches failing to improve diagnostic accuracy. The role of antibiotics in acute nonperforative appendicitis (NPA) remains unclear. In 175 patients studied at two hospitals, preoperative guidelines were used to exclude perforative appendicitis. Nevertheless, 14% of patients were found to have this condition. Surgeon's reports significantly underestimated the diagnosis when compared with the pathologists' reports. Antibiotic prophylaxis in 122 patients with NPA was studied prospectively comparing ceftizoxime (CTZ), cefamandole (CFM), and placebo (PLA). Ceftizoxime decreased the infection rate compared with PLA (0 vs. 8; P less than .01). Use of antibiotics (CTZ or CFM) resulted in decreased infections when compared with PLA (3 vs. 8; P less than .01) and fewer days of hospitalization (3.8 vs. 5.4 d, P less than .005). Analysis of infection risk factors showed no correlations except for failure to administer antibiotics and the finding of a gangrenous appendix. Operative culture results had no predictive value for either infection or pathogen identification. It is recommended that all patients undergoing surgery for NPA be given 1 d of antibiotic prophylaxis.This prospective randomized study included 100 patients with inguinal hernia and 66 patients operated on for acute appendicitis. In half of each group the skin was closed with a continuous subcuticular resorbable suture, and in the other half with a monofilament nylon matress suture. The patients were followed up after three weeks and again after three months. There was no obvious difference in cosmetic result between the two methods of skin closure. In the patients with inguinal hernia or non-perforated appendicitis there was no increase in postoperative infection of the wound after subcuticular suture. In the case of perforated appendicitis there may have been an increase in infection of the wound after subcuticular suture. Continuous, subcuticular resorbable suture used on the right indications can give a good cosmetic result and few complications of the wound. Further more, a separate outpatient visit for removal of skin sutures or staples can be avoided.In a prospective, block-randomized, multicenter study, the safety and efficacy of cefoxitin in preoperative prophylaxis were studied. 1735 patients undergoing appendectomy were evaluable, and half of these patients received 2 g of cefoxitin before undergoing operation. The patients were divided into three groups: patients with a normal appendix, patients with an acutely inflamed appendix, and patients with a gangrenous appendix. The study showed for each group a significant reduction of the incidence of wound infection in patients receiving prophylaxis. However, intra-abdominal abscess formation was not influenced by preoperative antibiotic prophylaxis. Consequently, routine preoperative prophylaxis is recommended before appendectomy.Thirty-two patients with primary adenocarcinoma of the appendix were studied in this collective review. Diagnosis was never suspected preoperatively. Immediate operation was performed in 21 patients with a diagnosis of acute appendicitis. At operation, tumor of the appendix was only identified in 50 percent of the 32 patients. One patient with an obstructing tumor and peritoneal involvement died postoperatively. Estimated survival rate was 46% at five years. Probability of survival was unrelated to the histologic tumor type but significantly correlated with the extent of tumor spread. Right hemicolectomy led to a significant increase in survival compared with appendectomy alone and to a significant decrease in risk of recurrence. In Dukes' B2 and C patients, differences in the survival curves were in favor of right hemicolectomy. In patients with pseudomyxoma peritonei, long-term survival was obtained by repeated laparotomy with resection of mucinous material. Our results indicate that, in good risk patients, right hemicolectomy performed as first or second operation, provides better results than appendectomy alone.A prospective randomized clinical trial was performed to determine the efficiency of single-dose antibiotic prophylaxis in preventing septic complications after appendectomy. The infection rate increased significantly in the control group without antibiotic prophylaxis (9.3% to 20.3%). Older patients with severe appendicitis had more advantages from the prophylaxis than younger ones. We have suggested to perform antibiotic prophylaxis individually only in those patients with high risk of septic complications after appendectomy.Two hundred and forty adults undergoing acute appendicectomy were randomised to receive either cefoxitin or ceftriaxone 1 g intravenously at induction of anaesthesia. Patients were monitored daily while in hospital, and at least 4 weeks after discharge for evidence of wound, urinary or lower respiratory tract infection. We evaluated 167 patients at follow up and found no significant difference in infection rates between the two antibiotic groups. Thirty-four had normal appendices and 1 of 16 (6.3%) given cefoxitin and 2 of 18 (11.1%) given ceftriaxone developed wound infections. Ninety-seven had acute appendicitis and 3 of 48 (6.3%) given cefoxitin and 3 of 49 (6.1%) given ceftriaxone developed infections including 2 wound infections in each group. Thirty-six had gangrenous perforated or abscessed appendices: 31 were given additional antibiotics postoperatively, and 4 of 18 (22.2%) in each prophylactic antibiotic group developed infections, including wound infection in 3 given cefoxitin and in 4 given ceftriaxone. None of the infections were serious. Sixty-one percent presented after discharge from hospital. The mean hospital stay was 4.6 days for each antibiotic group. Neither antibiotic caused adverse effects.In an attempt to reduce postoperative sepsis, a series of randomised, double-blind studies was begun in 1982, using cefotaxime as backbone therapy. Up to 1985 (stages I and II), the best results were obtained using a combination of cefotaxime (75 mg/kg intravenously in 3 doses at 12-hourly intervals) plus metronidazole (10 mg/kg intravenously in 3 doses), both drugs administered 1 hour before surgery (preoperatively) or at anaesthetic induction (peroperatively). In 300 consecutive cases, the wound infection rates were 1% in uncomplicated acute appendicitis and 5% in perforated/gangrenous appendices. The present study (stage III) reports the findings in 401 consecutive patients: 215 treated with the above regimen, either pre- or perioperatively (group 1) and 186 who additionally had peritoneal lavage with cefotaxime 2 g/L during surgery (group 2). There were 16 wound infections overall, 2 among patients administered prophylaxis preoperatively and 14 in those administered prophylaxis perioperatively. All produced mixed cultures, with Escherichia coli, Streptococcus milleri and Bacteroides fragilis predominating. The overall figures for postoperative sepsis are 12/215 (5.6%) in the non-lavage group and 8/186 (4.3%) in the lavage group. Among patients with a perforated and/or gangrenous appendix, the wound infection rate was 8/72 (11.1%) in the non-lavage group (group 1) and 4/66 (6.1%) in the lavage group (group 2). Each group had 2 cases of pelvic abscess.The efficacy of a single 500 mg intravenous intra-operative dose of metronidazole in the prevention of postoperative wound infection, following appendicectomy for acute mural appendicitis, was studied in a prospective randomized placebo controlled trial. Fourteen of the 96 patients (14.6%) in the metronidazole group and 13 of the 94 in the placebo group (13.8%) developed postoperative wound infection. Late sepsis was noted in 4 out of the 96 patients in the metronidazole group and in one of the 94 patients in the placebo group. This study suggests that a single intra-operative dose of metronidazole dose not reduce the incidence of postoperative wound infection following appendicectomy for acute mural appendicitis.This is a prospective and randomized study of 100 patients with acute appendicitis who were less than 10 years old, in which four different antibiotic regimens commonly in use against gram-negative and anaerobic bacteria were compared in terms of postoperative septic complications. The antibiotics were begun immediately preoperatively and continued for five days. Ten percent of the patients developed infection complications, with 4% requiring further surgery. The best results were obtained with cefoxitin (4% of infection), metronidazole plus amikacin and latamoxef (8%), while the regimen of clindamycin plus amikacin was associated with the greatest number of complications (20%). On analyzing the main microbiologic findings of the study, we conclude that some sort of antibiotic treatment is indicated in all types of appendicitis, due to the occult presence of bacteria in the peritoneal cavity, even without clinical evidence of gangrene or perforation. Further, we emphasize the significance of Streptococcus faecalis as being responsible, along with Escherichia coli and Bacteroides fragilis, for serious postoperative complications.Consecutive adult patients requiring emergency abdominal surgery were randomly allocated to preoperative treatment with metronidazole-gentamicin (M-G) or metronidazole-fosfomycin (M-F). Postoperative continuation of antibiotics depended on the estimated risk of septic complications. Peroperatively the cases were stratified as group A, acute inflamed appendicitis, or absence of septic disorder--no postoperative antibiotics, group B, gangrenous appendicitis or cholecystitis or intestinal obstruction without resection, or operations with contamination regarded as minor (gastrotomy or enterotomy)--three further doses of antibiotics, or group C, perforated appendicitis, perforation of the alimentary tract, generalized peritonitis or gross contamination--antibiotics continued for 5 days. Assessment for septic complications was made in 381 patients (191 M-G, 190 M-F). The total incidence was 4.8% (M-G 7.8%, M-F 1.6%, p less than 0.01). The difference was mainly due to higher infection rate in patients stratified to group C and randomized to M-G. Stratification thus permitted restricted duration of antibiotic treatment with a low septic complication rate, significantly less with M-F than with M-G regimen.Sulbactam is a beta-lactamase inhibitor that, when combined with ampicillin, gives the latter antibiotic a broad spectrum of activity, making it suitable for use as a prophylactic agent in acute appendicitis. In a single-blind, randomized trial, the efficacy of sulbactam plus ampicillin was compared with that of metronidazole plus cefotaxime. Thirty-five children undergoing appendectomy received intravenous sulbactam and ampicillin, while 38 children received metronidazole and cefotaxime. Single doses were given unless the appendix was considered gangrenous or perforated, in which case the drugs were administered for 72 hr. There were three wound infections in the group given sulbactam and ampicillin and five in the group given metronidazole and cefotaxime. The combination of sulbactam and ampicillin was well tolerated and appeared to be at least as effective as that of metronidazole and cefotaxime in the prevention of sepsis following appendectomy.A multicentre study of computer aided diagnosis for patients with acute abdominal pain was performed in eight centres with over 250 participating doctors and 16,737 patients. Performance in diagnosis and decision making was compared over two periods: a test period (when a small computer system was provided to aid diagnosis) and a baseline period (before the system was installed). The two periods were well matched for type of case and rate of accrual. The system proved reliable and was used in 75.1% of possible cases. User reaction was broadly favourable. During the test period improvements were noted in diagnosis, decision making, and patient outcome. Initial diagnostic accuracy rose from 45.6% to 65.3%. The negative laparotomy rate fell by almost half, as did the perforation rate among patients with appendicitis (from 23.7% to 11.5%). The bad management error rate fell from 0.9% to 0.2%, and the observed mortality fell by 22.0%. The savings made were estimated as amounting to 278 laparotomies and 8,516 bed nights during the trial period--equivalent throughout the National Health Service to annual savings in resources worth over 20m pounds and direct cost savings of over 5m pounds. Computer aided diagnosis is a useful system for improving diagnosis and encouraging better clinical practice.Intra-abdominal sepsis most frequently follows penetrating or blunt abdominal trauma or perforated appendicitis or diverticulitis. The initial leakage of the endogenous gastrointestinal microflora into the peritoneal cavity results in peritonitis and secondary septicemia, which is frequently followed by localized intra-abdominal abscess. These infections are most frequently polymicrobial and relate directly to the unique endogenous microflora at the various levels of the gastrointestinal tract. The treatment of intra-abdominal sepsis is primarily centered around prompt, appropriate surgical intervention. Parenterally administered antibiotics are also required to decrease the chance of local bacterial infection or septicemia. The choice of the appropriate agent(s) to be used initially, before the results of culture and sensitivity reports are available, depends primarily on the clinical presentation and also on whether the intra-abdominal infection occurred in the community or within the hospital setting. Clinical and experimental studies of intra-abdominal sepsis have largely stressed the use of antibiotic agents that have a spectrum of activity effective against the aerobic coliforms and anaerobic Bacteroides fragilis.Until recently intra-abdominal sepsis following surgery for perforated appendicitis has remained a frequent occurrence. In 1975 Fowler reported an incidence of one intra-abdominal abscess in 36 perforated appendicitis treated with a protocol consisting of saline irrigation at surgery, followed by intraperitoneal administration of cephaloridine q. 6 hours for 48 hours. The same antibiotic was then given i.v. for 72 hours. He concluded that this method was an effective way to minimize post-op intra-abdominal abscess, and that the intraperitoneal route was more effective, for this purpose, than systemic administration. More recently, with better knowledge of the role of anaerobes, improved results have also been obtained by adding clindamycin or metronidazole to the antibiotic regimen. A prospective study based on two groups of patients randomly assigned to two protocols was undertaken. The study group consisted of 45 children operated for perforated appendicitis with abscess or generalized peritonitis. These patients were treated with Fowler's protocol. Because it is less nephrotoxic and is active against the same organisms, cefazolin was used instead of cephaloridine. The control group consisted of 43 patients, also operated for perforated appendicitis, treated with saline irrigation at surgery, with either i.v. gentamycin or tobramycin and clindamycin or metronidazole for an average of 7.8 +/- 3.1 days. Both groups were fairly well matched in terms of age, sex, severity of disease, and bacterial flora. They showed an identical 6% post-op intra-abdominal sepsis rate. Days before afebrile, days under gastric suction, complications and average hospital stay were comparable in both groups. The wound infection rate was 20% in the study group and 9% in the control group.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)A prospective, randomized, and double-blind study was conducted with 864 patients operated on for appendicitis. In early cases, including normal and acute appendicitis, one dose of antibiotic was given. The rate of postappendectomy septic complications in patients who received cefotaxime, cefoperazone, or moxalactam was very low (about 3%), and there was no statistical difference between the drugs. For late cases, including gangrenous and perforated appendicitis, the antibiotics were continued for 5 days. Moxalactam decreased significantly the septic complications in these patients when compared with the other two drugs. It is safe, free from serious toxic side effects, and more convenient and easier to administer than combination antibiotic therapy. The main disadvantage of moxalactam is its high cost, but this has to be balanced against the savings in nursing time, the cost of monitoring renal function and serum level when aminoglycosides are used, and the reduced usage and manipulation of infusion sets.One-hundred consecutive patients undergoing appendicectomy either electively or for clinically diagnosed acute appendicitis were studied to examine the difference between the use of topical povidone-iodine (PVP-I) and ampicillin in the wound given at the time of closure. All patients were treated with metronidazole suppositories for 48 h starting at the time of pre-medication in addition to a topical agent. The overall wound infection rate was 14%. If the appendix was histologically normal or inflamed, the rate fell to 10% whereas if gangrenous or perforated it rose to 24%. Sixty-six per cent of the patients with a perforated appendicitis developed a wound infection. There was no significant difference in the wound infection rate between those treated with PVP-I and those with ampicillin. Topical antisepsis using PVP-I is preferable to ampicillin as it abolishes the risk of antibiotic resistance or allergy developing and since it is comparatively more cost-effective.Ticarcillin was compared with metronidazole in the prevention of wound infection after appendicectomy. Two hundred nine patients with a diagnosis of acute appendicitis were admitted to a prospective, randomized study and received 500 mg of metronidazole or 5 g of ticarcillin intravenously before operation. Those patients with gangrenous or perforated appendices received two additional doses of the trial drug at 8 hourly intervals. The overall incidence of wound infections in both the metronidazole and the ticarcillin groups was 9 percent. There were no intraabdominal abscesses. Metronidazole abolished anaerobic wound infections. All the early wound infections (between 2 and 4 days after operation) occurred in patients with gangrenous or perforated appendices. We conclude that ticarcillin is as effective as metronidazole in the prevention of wound infection after appendicectomy, but in high-risk patients, (those with gangrenous or perforated appendices) longer courses of antibiotics should be employed.Reports in the surgical literature are conflicting as to whether appendectomy "in passing" during laparotomy for trauma or for some other disease state does or does not significantly increase patient morbidity or mortality. A chart survey of all appendectomies (342 for acute appendicitis and 146 as incidental procedures) performed on the trauma service of Grady Memorial Hospital over a 40 month period appeared to indicate that the wound infection rate (6.8 percent) was the same as that for acute simple or suppurative appendicitis (6.7 percent), whereas the intraabdominal sepsis rate (17.5 percent) paralleled that for more advanced gangrenous or perforative appendicitis (18.6 percent). Since the validity of a retrospective review is always open to question, a prospective, randomized trial was carried out only on patients with a negative abdominal exploration for trauma over a 22 month interval at the same trauma service. An odd second from the last digit hospital number dictated appendectomy, provided the appendix was readily accessible; an even digit in the same locus dictated retention of the appendix. In no patient did intraperitoneal sepsis develop, regardless of the procedure chosen. Wound infection rates were 1.8 percent for appendectomy (1 of 56), if local anatomic considerations precluded an easy appendectomy (0 of 45), and 3.6 percent for the control subjects without appendectomy (3 of 83). There were no deaths. These data cast considerable doubt on the reliability of retrospective reviews and support the generally accepted dictum that incidental appendectomy, especially in the trauma patient, can be a relatively innocuous procedure.A prospective, randomized, double-blind clinical study was performed to determine the efficacy of perioperative systemic antibiotics in preventing infection after appendectomy for acute nonperforating appendicitis. One hundred three patients received three doses of either placebo (saline, n = 52) or cefoxitin sodium (n = 51). The two groups were similar with regard to age distribution, sex ratio, duration of operation, pathologic condition of appendix, and hospital stay. Postoperative wound infections were detected in 9.6% of the placebo-treated patients, whereas none occurred in the cefoxitin group. All but one infection appeared after discharge. Cost analysis identified a net savings of $ 84 per patient with the use of prophylactic antibiotics. Septic morbidity after appendectomy for nonperforating appendicitis is significantly reduced by systemic antibiotics, and brief administration of a single broad-spectrum agent (cefoxitin) is effective prophylaxis.In 173 patients (study group), undergoing appendicectomy because of suspected acute appendicitis, normal saline solution, in the amount of 10 ml per 1000 g of patient weight, was injected into the peritoneal cavity before closing the incision. A control group of patients undergoing appendicectomy was selected, matched for age and sex. The mean observation period was five years for both groups. One of the patients in the study group and two patients in the control group developed small intestinal obstruction due to adhesions which led to relaparotomy. The difference was not statistically significant. Because of the rarity of this complication after appendicectomy (1-2%) and the long elapse of time reported from the appendicectomy to the development of the small intestinal obstruction due to adhesions, the group of 173 patients in too small and the observation period of five years too short to enable a conclusion to be made so far. Further follow-up of the patients in this study and a further investigation is necessary.A total of 133 children, aged 16 months to 15 years (mean 6.7 years), with presumptive acute appendicitis, was included in a double-blind, placebo-controlled trial of the short-term (72 hour) use of metronidazole suppositories as prophylaxis against post-operative infection. There was no significant difference in the incidence or severity of wound infection or post-operative intra-abdominal sepsis between the metronidazole-treated and placebo groups. It is suggested that intra-rectal metronidazole, when used exclusively, is not sufficient for effective prophylaxis for appendicitis in childhood.Ninety-eight patients with suspected nonperforated acute appendicitis have to date been entered into a continuing, prospective, blinded randomized trial to determine the role of prophylactic metronidazole in postoperative wound infection. Twenty-six patients were excluded for the following reasons: diagnosis other than acute appendicitis (16), perforation of the appendix (8), administration of other antibiotics (1), and refusal to enter study (1). Seventy-two patients, 47 men and 25 women, with a mean age of 27.5 years (range 15 to 60 years), underwent appendectomy and were studied. Thirty patients received 1 gm intravenous metronidazole preoperatively and five intravenous doses of 500 mg metronidazole postoperatively. Forty-two patients received placebo only. Cultures of the appendiceal stump grew aerobic cultures in 45 (62%) and anaerobic organisms in 29 (40%): Escherichia coli and Bacteroides fragilis, respectively. Six of the 72 patients (8.2%) developed postoperative wound infections: four of 42 (9.5%) who received placebo and two of 30 (6.6%) who received metronidazole (P = 0.54 by Fisher exact test). No toxicity from metronidazole was observed. The postoperative wound infection rate is insufficient to demonstrate the efficacy of metronidazole for prophylaxis in nonperforated acute appendicitis, although there appears to be a tendency of to assume its efficacy in this regard.The authors question the need to give prophylactic antibiotics perioperatively in all cases of acute appendicitis without perforation to reduce the rate of wound infection. A retrospective study of 82 patients showed a wound infection rate of 4.8%; 3 of 53 patients who did not receive antibiotics had a wound infection compared with 1 of 29 patients who received antibiotics. A prospective double-blind clinical trial was performed comparing the results of perioperative administration of cefamandole and placebo. One of 21 patients who received the placebo had a wound infection; none of the 21 patients given cefamandole had infection. Thus, the authors conclude that, although reports in the literature suggest that antibiotics given perioperatively decrease the rate of wound infection in acute appendicitis without perforation, the incidence of such infection is too low to warrant routine administration. They suggest that such antibiotic use be reserved for those suspected of having more serious disease.A prospective, randomized, double-blind clinical study was performed to determined the efficacy of short-term (24 hr) perioperative antibiotics in preventing septic complications after emergency appendectomy for nonperforated appendicitis. The patients were stratified into three clinical arms: Group I (placebo, n = 45), Group II (cefamandole, n = 46) and Group III (cefamandole plus carbenicillin, n = 45). The three groups of patients were similar in regard to age, sex, duration of operation and pathologic classification of the appendix. The overall incidence of infection in the study was 5.1%. The infection rates in Groups II (2.2%) and III (0%) were significantly lower than Group I (placebo) (13.3%), (p less than 0.05). No difference was observed between cefamandole alone and cefamandole plus carbenicillin. Average postoperative hospital days per patient for each group was: Group I - 3.8 days; Group II - 2.9 days; Group III - 3.1 days. Cost analysis of hospitalization including cost of prophylactic antibiotics revealed a $247.99 per patient saving for Group II versus Group I and $95.53 for Group III versus Group I. Systemic prophylactic antibiotics can successfully reduce septic complications after appendectomy for nonperforated appendicitis, and a single drug (cefamandole) directed at the facultative pathogens is as effective as double drug therapy, which includes specific anaerobic coverage.In the search for an appropriate antibiotic to reduce the rate of postoperative wound infection in patients with acute appendicitis, we have randomized 150 patients preoperatively in a prospective 3-arm study. The operation technique was standardized for all patients and involved the use of plastic wound protectors. Bacterial contamination was documented by 3 swabs taken during operation. In 2 arms, patients received short-term adjuvant prophylaxis with either cefazolin or clindamycin/tobramycin. The third arm served as a control. Wound contamination ws proven in 33% of all cases but only 4% developed a real wound infection. The rate of infection was almost identical in all groups, without a statistically significant difference in the chi2 test. It is concluded that wound infection after appendectomy cannot be prevented by prophylactic use of antibiotics. Careful operation technique with local protective steps is quite sufficient. Antibiotics should therefore be reserved for special indications.A prospective placebo controlled randomized trial was carried out in 104 patients with a presumptive diagnosis of acute appendicitis. A single dose of 1 g of metronidazole was given intra-rectally 1 h preoperatively. There were 16 wound infections, 15 (out of 50) in the placebo group, 1 (out of 54) in the metronidazole group. This study supports the already accepted value of metronidazole but suggests that a single intra-rectal dose regimen is adequate for prophylaxis.A series of 102 patients with presumptive acute appendicitis entered a prospective, randomized, clinical trial of intrarectal metronidazole given over a 48-h period commencing before surgery. Adequate levels of circulating metronidazole were achieved. A significant reduction in the incidence of anaerobic wound infection was observed in the treated group (P less than 0.02). The convenience and short duration of the prophylactic regimen allowed early discharge from hospital. No untoward effects were observed.The author has studied microcirculatory changes in pyo-septic diseases in 112 children, 10 of them--healthy ones (control group). The use of an intense diuresis in complex treatment of severe forms of pyo-septic diseases in children results in a considerable decrease of the blood protheolytic activity and toxicity and allows to interrupt microcirculatory disorders 3 or 4 days earlier than the routine method of detoxication therapy.Consecutive patients undergoing emergency appendectomy (283) or urgent cholecystectomy (51) were prospectively studied for the development of post-operative incisional or peritoneal sepsis. Severity of the original peritoneal infection was carefully recorded, while use of a Penrose dam to drain the peritoneum was randomized according to pre-assigned hospital number. Both aerobic and anaerobic cultures were taken from the abdomen at the time of operation as well as from all postoperative infectious foci. Results demonstrated no essential differences in incidence of wound and peritoneal infection following appendectomy for simple or suppurative appendicitis (187) or following cholecystectomy for acute cholecystitis (51). However, with gangrenous or perforative appendicitis (94), incisional and intra-abdominal infection rates were 43% and 45%, respectively, when a drain was used; yet only 29 and 13%, respectively, without a drain. These latter differences were significant (p < 0.001). In addition, intra-abdominal abscesses were three times as likely to drain through the incision than along any tract provided by the rubber conduit. Cultures revealed that hospital pathogens accounted for a greater proportion of wound and peritoneal sepsis after cholecystectomy and appendectomy for simple or suppurative appendicitis if a drain had been inserted than if managed otherwise. By contrast, a mixed bacterial flora was responsible for most infections following appendectomy for gangrenous or perforated appendicitis, irrespective as to use of a drain.A prospective, randomized, double-blind study on the effect of cephaloridine prophylaxis in the surgical management of appendicitis was performed. Of the 139 patients studied, 70 received cephaloridine and 69 received placebo prophylaxis. Both groups of patients were well matched with regard to age, sex, operative findings, and bacteria isolated at operation. Postoperative wound infections were detected in 11.6% of placebo-treated patients and in 1.4% of cephaloridine-treated patients (P less than .02). Prophylactic treatment with cephaloridine of patients undergoing surgery for uncomplicated appendicitis resulted in a perceptible reduction in the rate of postoperative wound infection.This paper reports a controlled trial of human and computer-aided diagnosis in a series of 552 patients with acute abdominal pain. The overall diagnostic accuracy of the computer-aided system was 91.5% and that of the senior clinician to see each case was 81.2%. However, the clinician's diagnostic performance improved markedly during the period of the trial. The proportion of appendices which perforated before operation fell from 36% to 4% during the trial, and the negative laparotomy rate dropped sharply. After the trial closed in August 1972 these figures reverted towards their pretrial levels.It is suggested that while computer-aided diagnosis is a valuable direct adjunct to the clinician dealing with the "acute abdomen," he may also benefit in the short-term from the constant feedback he receives and from the disciplines and constraints involved in communicating with the computer.This paper reports a controlled prospective unselected real-time comparison of human and computer-aided diagnosis in a series of 304 patients suffering from abdominal pain of acute onset.The computing system's overall diagnostic accuracy (91.8%) was significantly higher than that of the most senior member of the clinical team to see each case (79.6%). It is suggested as a result of these studies that the provision of such a system to aid the clinician is both feasible in a real-time clinical setting, and likely to be of practical value, albeit in a small percentage of cases.Initial results show a shorter hospital stay and lower costs for the group of children with sequential postoperative antimicrobial therapy.Families experience significant parenting distress related to the child's functioning and disruption in the child's quality of life that may be because of the delay in fully resolving the child's medical condition. In addition, parents experience negative consequences to their own stress as a result of the delay before the child's appendectomy.French Ministry of Health, Programme Hospitalier de Recherche Clinique 2002.Morphine relieved abdominal pain and improved the patients' cooperation for treatment and care. Furthermore, the morphine did not mask the physical signs of acute appendicitis.NCT00469430 (http://www.clinicaltrials.gov).Our conclusion is that antibiotic treatment in the patients with acute appendicitis is quite effective, and these patients may not need surgery. The patients managed conservatively with antibiotics alone experience less pain and require less analgesia but have high recurrent rate.Defining perforation as a hole in the appendix or a fecalith in the abdomen is effective in identifying the patients at risk for postoperative abscess formation. Application of these criteria would allow substantial reduction in therapy for patients with purulent or gangrenous appendicitis who do not possess the same abscess risk. These data outline the first evidence-based definition of perforation.Tigecycline was similar to imipenem-cilastatin in terms of both efficacy and health resource utilization. Risk factors identified in this study for both outcome measures are offered as support for guiding clinical practice.Acute non-perforated appendicitis can be treated successfully with antibiotics. However, there is a risk of recurrence in cases of acute appendicitis, and this risk should be compared with the risk of complications after appendectomy.The conventional treatment of acute appendicitis is appendectomy followed by intravenous (IV) antibiotics until intraabdominal infection has resolved. It is controversial as to whether it is efficacious to add a course of oral antibiotics after cessation of IV antibiotics. All consenting patients who presented to Kern Medical Center between October 2000 and June 2003 with acute appendicitis were entered into the study. Perforated/gangrenous appendicitis was equally represented in the two study arms. After appendectomy, and when IV antibiotics were ready to be discontinued, patients were randomized to receive a 7-day outpatient course of either placebo (Group 1) or oral antibiotics (Group 2). Patients were monitored for infectious complications for a minimum of 3 months, and there was no statistical difference (11.5% in Group 1 vs 12.1% in Group 2, P = 0.61). The data suggest that adding a course of outpatient oral antibiotics, after completing a course of IV antibiotics, does not decrease postoperative infectious complications in appendicitis patients.Pediatric patients with appendicitis can safely be offered laparoscopic appendectomy without incurring a greater risk for complications. Nevertheless, a higher (but not significantly higher) abscess rate was found in patients with perforated appendicitis who underwent laparoscopy.Significant variability in practice patterns and resource utilization exists in the management of acute appendicitis in pediatric hospitals. Clinical outcomes could be improved by collaborative initiatives to adopt evidence-based best practices.To demonstrate the efficacy of oral metronidazole (OM) in simple or complicated appendicitis with localized peritonitis, a randomized prospective study was carried out in 1083 patients, ranging in age from 4 to 50 years (mean age, 21.38). The patients were randomly divided into two groups. The study group (SG) (524 patients) received OM (500 mg for adults, 7-10 mg/kg if less than 15 years) 2-3 hours before operation. The drug was continued 4 to 5 hours after operation, every 8 hours, for three doses if the appendix was mild to severely inflamed. In the case of complicated appendicitis (114 patients), the same dose was given for 3 to 6 days, depending on the absence or presence of pus. Ceftizoxime was administered to the control group (CG) (559 patients) 2 to 3 hours before operation and then postoperatively every 6 hours for three doses if the appendix was mild to severely inflamed. The complicated cases in the CG (120 patients) received a combination of penicillin, chloramphenicol, and gentamicin for 3 to 6 days, depending on the absence or presence of pus. The serum concentration of metronidazole measured in 43 patients was at bactericidal level in 40 (mean +/- SD standard deviation, 10.65 +/- 4.89 microg/mL). The rate of wound infection was not significantly different in the SG and the CG with the same degree of pathology (3.17% vs 2.96% if uncomplicated; 15.78% vs 14.16% if complicated, respectively). Pelvic collection occurred in four adults and one child in the CG with perforated appendicitis (4.16%). The same complication developed in two adults and two children in the SG with perforated appendicitis (3.5%). All six adults and one of the children in the SG had to be re-explored, whereas the remaining two children responded to conservative management (OM and gentamicin). In uncomplicated cases, hospital stay and hospital charge were both almost the same in both groups. However, length of hospitalization was nearly 1 day shorter and hospital cost per day was about 30 per cent less in complicated cases in the SG as compared with the CG. Conclusively, OM may not only substitute parenteral antibiotics in acute appendicitis as a prophylactic agent, but it may also be used as a cost-effective drug and is more convenient to the patient.Traditional intraoperative abdominal cavity culture can be abandoned. In perforated appendicitis, colonic flora can be predicted, and antibiotic therapy should begun without any abdominal cavity culture results. This practical approach will save money and reduce laboratory work without affecting the patient's morbidity.This study demonstrates a small but significant reduction (approximately one day) in post-operative fever, duration of antibiotic treatment, and hospital stay for patients treated with MP compared to those treated with T/C.In a randomized study we investigated the effects of antibiotics as the only treatment in acute appendicitis. Forty patients were examined, 19 after antibiotic treatment (one operated due to perforation) and 21 after surgery. All patients were examined prior to randomization, after 10 days and after 30 days. Of the positive ultrasonographic (US) findings, 18 (86%) of the 21 operated patients had histologically proven acute appendicitis. At the 10th day, 9 patients had a seroma under the scar, which had disappeared a month after surgery in all patients. In the 19 patients conservatively treated with antibiotics, the appendix could be visualized in 8 symptom-free cases on the 10th day. In 5 of the 8 patients the appendix was still visualized after 1 month. Three of these 5 had recurrent appendicitis within a year. It is concluded that US can be used not only in diagnosing acute appendicitis, but also in the evaluation of treatments such as antibiotics.In a prospective controlled study the effect of antibiotics as the only treatment in acute appendicitis was evaluated. Of 40 patients admitted with a duration of abdominal pain of less than 72 h, 20 received antibiotics intravenously for 2 days followed by oral treatment for 8 days and 20 considered as controls were randomized to surgery. All patients treated conservatively were discharged within 2 days, except one who required surgery after 12 h because of peritonitis secondary to perforated appendicitis. Seven patients were readmitted within 1 year as a result of recurrent appendicitis and underwent surgery, when appendicitis was confirmed. The diagnostic accuracy within the operated group was 85 per cent. One patient had perforated appendicitis at operation. Antibiotic treatment in patients with acute appendicitis was as effective as surgery. The patients had less pain and required less analgesia, but the recurrence rate was high.An open-label prospective study was performed employing intramuscularly administered imipenem as an adjunct to surgery in 20 patients with acute cholecystitis and 24 patients with perforated or gangrenous appendicitis. Three (12.5%) septic failures occurred in appendicitis patients and 2 (10%) failures in cholecystitis patients. There were no deaths. Adverse effects were minor, and there was no toxicity. Although failures were not associated with in vitro resistance, Pseudomonas spp. were recovered from 2 of 3 appendicitis failures. Intramuscular imipenem appeared to be an effective single-drug antimicrobial when used as an adjunct to surgery in patients with acute cholecystitis or perforated appendicitis. It should be a more cost-effective alternative to the current multiple-drug therapy frequently employed in patients with intra-abdominal sepsis.A prospective, randomized, double-blind clinical study was performed to determine the efficacy of perioperative systemic antibiotics in preventing infection after appendectomy for acute nonperforating appendicitis. One hundred three patients received three doses of either placebo (saline, n = 52) or cefoxitin sodium (n = 51). The two groups were similar with regard to age distribution, sex ratio, duration of operation, pathologic condition of appendix, and hospital stay. Postoperative wound infections were detected in 9.6% of the placebo-treated patients, whereas none occurred in the cefoxitin group. All but one infection appeared after discharge. Cost analysis identified a net savings of $ 84 per patient with the use of prophylactic antibiotics. Septic morbidity after appendectomy for nonperforating appendicitis is significantly reduced by systemic antibiotics, and brief administration of a single broad-spectrum agent (cefoxitin) is effective prophylaxis.